len: 517  is_ascii: True 声明：本书为TXT图书下载网(bookdown.com.cn)的用户上传至其在本站的存储空间，本站只提供TXT全集电子书存储服务以及免费下载服务，以下作品内容之版权与本站无任何关系。
---------------------------用户上传之内容开始--------------------------------
本书由TXT小说电子书下载网站http://www.bookdown.com.cn提供.
声明：本书仅供读者预览,请在下载24小时内删除，不得用作商业用途；如果喜欢请购买正版图书！
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 126  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
Where must the puma have come from?
len: 1513  is_ascii: True     Pumas are large, cat-like animals which are found in America. When reports came into London Zoo that a wild puma had been spotted forty-five miles south of London, they were not taken seriously. However, as the evidence began to accumulate, experts from the Zoo felt obliged to investigate, for the descriptions given by people who claimed to have seen the puma were extraordinarily similar.
    The hunt for the puma began in a small village where a woman picking blackberries saw 'a large cat' only five yards away from her. It immediately ran away when she saw it, and experts confirmed that a puma will not attack a human being unless it is cornered. The search proved difficult, for the puma was often observed at one place in the morning and at another place twenty miles away in the evening. Wherever it went, it left behind it a trail of dead deer and small animals like rabbits. Paw prints were seen in a number of places and puma fur was found clinging to bushes. Several people complained of "cat-like noises' at night and a businessman on a fishing trip saw the puma up a tree. The experts were now fully convinced that the animal was a puma, but where had it come from? As no pumas had been reported missing from any zoo in the country, this one must have been in the possession of a private collector and somehow managed to escape. The hunt went on for several weeks, but the puma was not caught. It is disturbing to think that a dangerous wild animal is still at large in the quiet countryside.
len: 68  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
 
     puma
n.   美洲狮
len: 30  is_ascii: True      spot
v.   看出，发现
len: 25  is_ascii: True      evidence
n.   证据
len: 36  is_ascii: True      accumulate
v.   积累，积聚
len: 38  is_ascii: True      oblige
v.   使……感到必须
len: 30  is_ascii: True      hunt
n.   追猎；寻找
len: 27  is_ascii: True      blackberry
n.   黑莓
len: 28  is_ascii: True      human being
     人类
len: 50  is_ascii: True      corner
v.   使走投无路，使陷入困境
len: 34  is_ascii: True      trail
n.   一串，一系列
len: 22  is_ascii: True      print
n.   印痕
len: 19  is_ascii: True      cling
v.   粘
len: 34  is_ascii: True      convince
v.   使……信服
len: 57  is_ascii: True      somehow
adv. 不知怎么搞地，不知什么原因
len: 30  is_ascii: True      disturb
v.   令人不安
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 1469  is_ascii: True     美洲狮是一种体形似猫的大动物，产于美洲。当伦敦动物园接到报告说，在伦敦以南45英里处发现一只美洲狮时，这些报告并没有受到重视。可是，随着证据越来越多，动物园的专家们感到有必要进行一番调查，因为凡是声称见到过美洲狮的人们所描述的情况竟是出奇地相似。
    搜寻美洲狮的工作是从一座小村庄开始的。那里的一位妇女在采摘黑莓时的看见“一只大猫”，离她仅5码远，她刚看见它，它就立刻逃走了。专家证实，美洲狮非被逼得走投无路，是决不会伤人的。事实上搜寻工作很困难，因为常常是早晨在甲地发现那只美洲狮，晚上却在20英里外的乙地发现它的踪迹。无论它走哪儿，一路上总会留下一串死鹿及死兔子之类的小动物，在许多地方看见爪印，灌木丛中发现了粘在上面的美洲狮毛。有人抱怨说夜里听见“像猫一样的叫声”；一位商人去钓鱼，看见那只美洲狮在树上。专家们如今已经完全肯定那只动物就是美洲狮，但它是从哪儿来的呢？由于全国动物园没有一家报告丢了美洲狮，因此那只美洲狮一定是某位私人收藏豢养的，不知怎么设法逃出来了。搜寻工作进行了好几个星期，但始终未能逮住那只美洲狮。想到在宁静的乡村里有一头危险的野兽继续逍遥流窜，真令人担心。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 146  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
Was the vicar pleased that the clock was striking? Why?
len: 1391  is_ascii: True     Our vicar is always raising money for one cause or another, but he has never managed to get enough money to have the church clock repaired. The big clock which used to strike the hours day and night was damaged many years ago and has been silent ever since.
    One night, however, our vicar work up with a start: the clock was striking the hours! Looking at his watch, he saw that it was one o'clock, but the bell struck thirteen times before it stopped. Armed with a torch, the vicar went up into the clock tower to see what was going on. In the torchlight, he caught sight of a figure whom he immediately recognized as Bill Wilkins, our local grocer.
    'Whatever are you doing up here Bill?' asked the vicar in surprise. 
    'I'm trying to repair the bell,' answered Bill. 'I've been coming up here night after night for weeks now. You see, I was hoping to give you a surprise.'
    'You certainly did give me a surprise!' said the vicar. 'You've probably woken up everyone in the village as well. Still, I'm glad the bell is working again.'
    That's the trouble, vicar,' answered Bill. 'It's working all right, but I'm afraid that at one o'clock it will strike thirteen times and there's nothing I can do about it."
    We'll get used to that, Bill,' said the vicar. "Thirteen is not as good as one, but it's better than nothing. Now let's go downstairs and have a cup of tea.' 
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 23  is_ascii: True      equal 
v.   等于
len: 22  is_ascii: True      vicar
n.   牧师
len: 37  is_ascii: True      raise
v.   募集，筹（款）
len: 30  is_ascii: True      torchlight
n.   电筒光
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 153  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
How did the archaeologists know that the statue was a goddess?
len: 1467  is_ascii: True     Some time ago, and interesting discovery was made by archaeologists on the Aegean island of Kea. An American team explored a temple which stands in an ancient city on the promontory of Ayia Irini. The city at one time must have been prosperous, for it enjoyed a high level of civilization. Houses -- often three storeys high -- were built of stone. They had large rooms with beautifully decorated walls. The city was equipped with a drainage system, for a great many clay pipes were found beneath the narrow streets.
    The temple which the archaeologists explored was used as a place of worship from the fifteenth century B.C. until Roman times. In the most sacred room of temple, clay fragments of fifteen statues were found. Each of these represented a goddess and had, at one time, been painted. The body of one statue was found among remains dating from the fifteenth century B.C. It's missing head happened to be among remains of the fifth century B.C. This head must have been found in Classical times and carefully preserved. It was very old and precious even then. When the archaeologists reconstructed the fragments, they were amazed to find that the goddess turned out to be a very modern-looking woman. She stood three feet high and her hands rested on her hips. She was wearing a full-length skirt which swept the ground. Despite her great age, she was very graceful indeed, but, so far, the archaeologists have been unable to discover her identity.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 30  is_ascii: True      goddess(tile)
n.   女神
len: 36  is_ascii: True      archaeologist
n.   考古学家
len: 29  is_ascii: True      Aegean
adj. 爱玲海的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      explore
v.   考察，勘探
len: 27  is_ascii: True      promontory
n.   海角
len: 57  is_ascii: True      prosperous
adj. （经济上）繁荣的，昌盛的
len: 29  is_ascii: True      civilization
n.   文明
len: 23  is_ascii: True      storey
n.   楼层
len: 25  is_ascii: True      drainage
n.   排水
len: 24  is_ascii: True      worship
n.   祟拜
len: 38  is_ascii: True      sacred
adj. 宗教的，神圣的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      fragment
n.   碎片
len: 42  is_ascii: True      remains
n.   遗物，遗迹，废墟
len: 50  is_ascii: True      classical
adj. （希腊和罗马）古化的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      reconstruct
v.   修复
len: 30  is_ascii: True      rest
v.   倚放，放置
len: 29  is_ascii: True      hip
n.   屁股，臀部
len: 46  is_ascii: True      full-length
adj. （裙衣）拖地长的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      graceful
adj. 优雅的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      identity
n.   身份
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 128  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below. 
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
Why did Alf want a white-collar job?
len: 1336  is_ascii: True     These days, people who do manual work often receive far more money than people who work in offices. People who work in offices are frequently referred to as "white-collar workers' for the simple reason that they usually wear a collar and tie to go to work. Such is human nature, that a great many people are often willing to sacrifice higher pay for the privilege of becoming white-collar workers. This can give rise to curious situations, as it did in the case of Alfred Bloggs who worked as a dustman for the Ellesmere Corporation.
    When he got married, Alf was too embarrassed to say anything to his wife about his job. He simply told her that he worked for the Corporation. Every morning, he left home dressed in a smart black suit. He then changed into overalls and spent the next eight hours as a dustman. Before returning home at night. He took a shower and changed back into his suit. Alf did this for over two years and his fellow dustmen kept his secret Alf's wife has never discovered that she married a dustman and she never will, for Alf has just found another job. He will soon be working in an office. He will be earning only half as much as he used to, but he feels that his rise in status is well worth the loss of money. From now on, he will wear a suit all day and others will call him 'Mr. Bloggs', not 'Alf'.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 26  is_ascii: True      manual
adj. 体力的
len: 21  is_ascii: True     collar
n.  衣领
len: 33  is_ascii: True     sacrifice
v.  牺牲，献出
len: 24  is_ascii: True     privilege
n.  好处
len: 25  is_ascii: True     dustman
n.  清洁工
len: 26  is_ascii: True     corporation
n.  公司
len: 26  is_ascii: True     overalls
n.  工作服
len: 21  is_ascii: True     shower
n.  淋浴
len: 21  is_ascii: True     secret
n.  秘密
len: 21  is_ascii: True     status
n.  地位
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 167  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
What was the consequence of the editor's insistence on facts and statistics?
len: 1428  is_ascii: True     Editors of newspapers and magazines often go to extremes to provide their reader with unimportant facts and statistics. Last year a journalist had been instructed by a well-known magazine to write an article on the president's palace in a new African republic. When the article arrived, the editor read the first sentence and then refuse to publish it. The article began: 'Hundreds of steps lead to the high wall which surrounds the president's palace'. The editor at once sent the journalist a fax instructing him find out the exact number of steps and the height of the wall.
    The journalist immediately set out to obtain these important facts, but the took a long time to send them Meanwhile, the editor was getting impatient, for the magazine would soon go to press. He sent the journalist two more faxes, but received no reply. He sent yet another fax informing the journalist that if he did not reply soon he would be fired. When the journalist again failed to reply, the editor reluctantly published the article as it had originally been written. A week later, the editor at last received a fax from the journalist. Not only had the poor man been arrested, but he had been sent to prison as well. However, he had at last been allowed to send a fax in which he informed the editor that the he had been arrested while counting the 1,084 steps leading to the fifteen-foot wall which surrounded the president's palace.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 23  is_ascii: True      editor
n.   编辑
len: 24  is_ascii: True      extreme
n.   极端
len: 33  is_ascii: True      statistics
n.   统计数字
len: 33  is_ascii: True      journalist
n.   新闻记者
len: 26  is_ascii: True      president
n.   总统
len: 41  is_ascii: True      palace
n.   王宫；宏伟的住宅
len: 24  is_ascii: True      publish
v.   出版
len: 20  is_ascii: True      fax
n.   传真
len: 32  is_ascii: True      impatient
adj. 不耐烦的
len: 21  is_ascii: True      fire
v.   解雇
len: 45  is_ascii: True      originally
adv. 起初，原先，从前
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1370  is_ascii: True     The expensive shops in a famous near Piccadilly were just "opening. At this time of the morning, the arcade was almost empty. Mr. Taylor, the owner of a jewellery shop was admiring a new display. Two of his assistants had been working busily since eight o'clock and had only just finished. Diamond necklaces and rings had been beautifully arranged on a background of black velvet. After gazing at the display for several minutes, Mr. Taylor went back into his shop.
    The silence was suddenly broken when a large car, with its headlights on and its home blaring, roared down the arcade. It came to a stop outside the jeweller's. One man stayed at the wheel while two others with black stocking over their faces jumped out and smashed the window of the shop with iron bars. While this was going on, Mr. Taylor was upstairs. He and his staff began throwing furniture out of the window. Chairs and tables went flying into the arcade. One of the thieves was struck by a heavy statue, but he was too busy helping himself to diamonds to notice any pain. The raid was all over in three minutes, for the men scrambled back into the car and it moved off at a fantastic speed. Just as it was leaving, Mr. Taylor rushed out and ran after it throwing ashtrays and vases, but it was impossible to stop the thieves. They had got away with thousands of pounds worth of diamonds. 
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 40  is_ascii: True      smash-and-grab
n.   砸橱窗抢劫
len: 59  is_ascii: True      arcade
n.   有拱廊的街道（两旁常设商店）
len: 39  is_ascii: True      Piccadilly
n.   皮卡迪利大街
len: 37  is_ascii: True      jewllery
n.   珠宝（总称）
len: 25  is_ascii: True      necklace
n.   项链
len: 22  is_ascii: True      ring 
n.   戒指
len: 27  is_ascii: True      background
n.   背景
len: 35  is_ascii: True      velvet
n.   天鹅绒，丝绒
len: 41  is_ascii: True      headlight
n.   （汽车等）前灯
len: 37  is_ascii: True      blare
v.   发嘟嗜声，吼叫
len: 34  is_ascii: True      staff
n.   全体工作人员
len: 21  is_ascii: True      raid
n.   偷袭
len: 25  is_ascii: True      scramble
n.   偷袭
len: 25  is_ascii: True      scramble
v.   爬行
len: 32  is_ascii: True      fantastic
adj. 非常大的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      ashtray
n.   烟灰缸
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1530  is_ascii: True     Has it ever happened to you? Have you ever put your trousers in the washing machine and then remembered there was a large bank note in your back pocket? When you rescued your trousers, did note in your back pocket? When you rescued your trousers, did you find the note was whiter than white? People who live in Britain needn't despair when they made mistakes like this (and a lot of people do)! Fortunately for them, the Bank of England has a team called Mutilated Ladies which deals with claims from people who fed their money to a machine or to their dog. Dogs, it seems, love to chew up money!
    A recent case concerns Jane Butlin whose fiancé, John, runs a successful furniture business. John had very good day and put his wallet containing $3,000 into the microwave oven for safekeeping. Then he and Jane went horse-riding. When they got home, Jane cooked their dinner in the microwave oven and without realizing it, cooked her fiancé's wallet as well. Imagine their dismay when they found a beautifully-cooked wallet and notes turned to ash! John went to see his bank manager who sent the remains of wallet and the money to the special department of the Bank of England in Newcastle: the Mutilate Ladies! They examined the remain and John got all his money back. 'So long as there's something to identify, we will give people their money back,' said a spokeswoman for the Bank. 'Last year, we paid $1.5m on 21,000 claims. Damaged bank notes. The Queen's head appears on English bank notes, and 'lady' refers to this.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 34  is_ascii: True      mutilate
v.   使残缺不全
len: 22  is_ascii: True      chew 
v.   咀嚼
len: 38  is_ascii: True      microwave
n.   微波，微波炉
len: 21  is_ascii: True      oven
n.   炉灶
len: 35  is_ascii: True      safekeeping
n.   妥善保管 
len: 50  is_ascii: True      Newcastle
n.   纽卡斯尔（英国港市）
len: 34  is_ascii: True      identify
v.   鉴定，识别
len: 50  is_ascii: True      spokeswoman
n.   女发言人
  
参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1435  is_ascii: True     The Great St. Bernard Pass connects Switzerland to Italy. At 2,473 metres, it is the highest mountain pass in Europe. The famous monastery of St. Bernard, witch was founded in eleventh century, lies about a mile away. For hundreds of years, St. Bernard dogs have saved the lives of travellers crossing the dangerous Pass. These friendly dogs, which were first brought from Asia, were used as watchdogs even in Roman times. Now that a tunnel ahs been built through the mountains, the Pass is less dangerous, but each year, the dogs are still sent out into the snow whenever a traveller is in difficulty. Despite the new tunnel, there are still a few people who rashly attempt to cross the Pass on foot.
    During the summer months, the monastery is very busy, for it is visited by thousands of people who cross the Pass in cars. As there are so many people about, the dogs have to be kept in a special enclosure. In winter, however, life at the monastery is quite different. The temperature drops to -- 30 o and very few people attempt to cross the Pass. The monks prefer winter to summer of they have more privacy. The dogs have greater freedom, too, for they are allowed to wander outside their enclosure. The only regular visitors to the monastery in winter are parties of skiers who go there at Christmas and Easter. These young people, who love the peace of mountains, always receive a warm welcome at St. Bernard's monastery.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 38  is_ascii: True      monastery
n.   寺院，修道院
len: 34  is_ascii: True      St. Bernard
     圣伯纳德
len: 21  is_ascii: True      pass
n.   关隘
len: 28  is_ascii: True      watchdog
n.   看门狗
len: 38  is_ascii: True      rashly
adj. 莽撞地，冒失地
len: 35  is_ascii: True      enclosure
n.   围场，圈地
len: 21  is_ascii: True      monk
n.   和尚
len: 33  is_ascii: True      privacy
n.   清静，隐居
len: 25  is_ascii: True      skier
n.   滑雪者
len: 26  is_ascii: True      Easter
n.   复活节
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1420  is_ascii: True     Cats never fail to fascinate human beings. They can be friendly and affectionate towards humans, but they lead mysterious lives of their own as well. They never become submissive like dogs and horses. As a result, humans have learned to respect feline independence. Most cats remain suspicious of humans all their lives. One of the things that fascinates us most about cats is the popular belief that they have nine lives. Apparently, there is a good deal of truth in this idea. A cat's ability to survive falls is based on fact.
    Recently the New York Animal Medical Center made a study of 132 cats over a period of five months. All these cats had one experience in common: they had fallen off high buildings, yet only eight of them died from shock or injuries. Of course, New York is the ideal place for such an interesting study, because there is no shortage of tall buildings. There are plenty of high-rise windowsills to fall from! One cat, Sabrina, fell 32 storeys, yet only suffered from a broken tooth. 'Cats behave like well-trained paratroopers.' a doctor said. It seems that the further cats fall, the less they are likely to injure themselves. In a long drop, they reach speeds of 60 miles an hour and more. At high speeds, falling cats have time to relax. They stretch out their legs like flying squirrels. This increases their air-resistance and reduces the shock of impact when they hit the ground.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 38  is_ascii: True      fascinate
v.   迷住，吸引住
len: 47  is_ascii: True      affectionate
adj. 充满深情，柔情的
len: 48  is_ascii: True      mysterious
adj. 神秘的，难以理解的
len: 42  is_ascii: True      submissive
adj. 服从的，顺从的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      feline
adj. 猫的
len: 41  is_ascii: True      independence
n.   独立，独立性
len: 29  is_ascii: True      high-rise
adj. 高层的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      windowsill
n.   窗槛
len: 28  is_ascii: True      paratrooper
n.   伞兵
len: 25  is_ascii: True      squirrel
n.   松鼠
len: 37  is_ascii: True      air-resistance
n.   空气阻力
len: 26  is_ascii: True      impact
n.   冲击力
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 185  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
What would have happened if only two of the sixteen water-tight compartments had been flooded?
len: 1440  is_ascii: True     The great ship, Titanic, sailed for New York from Southampton on April 10th, 1912. She was carrying 1,316 passengers and crew of 891. Even by modern standards, the 46,000 ton Titanic was a colossal ship. At the time, however, she was not only the largest ship that had ever been built, but was regarded as unsinkable, for she had sixteen watertight compartments. Even if two of these were flooded, she would still be able to float. The tragic sinking of this great liner will always be remembered, for she went down on her first voyage with heavy loss of life.
    Four days after setting out, while the Titanic was sailing across the icy water of the North Atlantic, huge iceberg was suddenly spotted by a lookout. After the alarm had been given, the great ship turned sharply to avoid a direct collision. The Titanic turned just in time, narrowly missing the immense walk of ice which rose over 100 feet out of the water beside her. Suddenly, there was a slight trembling sound from below, and the captain went down to see what had happened. The noise had been so faint that no one though that the ship had been damaged. Below, the captain realized to his horror that the Titanic was sinking rapidly, for five of her sixteen watertight compartments had already been flooded! The order to abandon ship was given and hundreds of people plunged into the icy water. As there were not enough lifeboats for everybody, 1,500 lives were lost.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 52  is_ascii: True      Southampton
n.   南安普敦（英国港市）
len: 28  is_ascii: True      colossal
adj. 庞大的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      watertight
adj. 不漏水的
len: 45  is_ascii: True      compartment
n.  （轮船的）密封舱
len: 25  is_ascii: True      flood
v.   充满水
len: 31  is_ascii: True      float
v.   漂浮，飘浮
len: 26  is_ascii: True      tragic
adj. 悲惨的
len: 22  is_ascii: True      liner
n.   班船
len: 23  is_ascii: True      voyage
n.   航行
len: 24  is_ascii: True      iceberg
n.   冰山
len: 27  is_ascii: True      lookout
n.   了望员
len: 26  is_ascii: True      collision
n.   碰撞
len: 37  is_ascii: True      narrowly
adv. 刚刚，勉强地
len: 21  is_ascii: True      miss
v.   避开
len: 26  is_ascii: True      slight
adj. 轻微的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      tremble
v.   震颤
len: 25  is_ascii: True      faint
adj. 微弱的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      horror
n.   恐惧
len: 24  is_ascii: True      abandon
v.   抛弃
len: 32  is_ascii: True      plunge
v.   投入，跳入
len: 28  is_ascii: True      lifeboat
n.   救生船
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 132  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
What was the Customs Officer looking for?
len: 1549  is_ascii: True     Customs Officers are quite tolerant these days, but they can still stop you when you are going through the Green Channel and have nothing to declare. Even really honest people are often made to feel guilty. The hardened professional smuggler, on the other hand, is never troubled by such feelings, even if he has five hundred gold watches hidden in his suitcase. When I returned form abroad recently, a particularly officious young Customs Officer clearly regarded me as a smuggler.
    'Have you anything to declare?' he asked, looking me in the eye.
    'No', I answered confidently.
    'Would you mind unlocking this suitcase please?'
    'Not at all,' I answered.
    The Officer went through the case with great care. All the thing I had packed so carefully were soon in a dreadful mess. I felt sure I would never be able to close the case again. Suddenly, I saw the Officer's face light up. He had spotted a tiny bottle at the bottom of my case and he pounced on it with delight.
    'Perfume, eh?' he asked sarcastically. 'You should have declared that. Perfume is not exempt from import duty.'
    'But it isn't perfume,' I said. 'It's hair gel.' Then I added with a smile, 'It's a strange mixture I make myself.'
    As I expected, he did not believe me.
    'Try it!' I said encouragingly.
    The officer unscrewed the cap and put the bottle to his nostrils. He was greeted by an unpleasant smell which convinced him that I was telling the truth. A few minutes later, I was able to hurry away with precious chalk marks on my baggage.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 38  is_ascii: True      guilty
adj. 犯罪的，违法的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      tolerant
adj. 宽容的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      declare
v.   申报
len: 31  is_ascii: True      hardened
adj. 有经验的
len: 45  is_ascii: True      professional 
adj. 职业的，专业的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      smuggler
n.   走私者
len: 35  is_ascii: True      officious
adj. 爱管闲事的
len: 79  is_ascii: True      confidently
adv. 自信地
   
     dreadful
adj. 可怕的，一团糟的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      pounce
v.   猛抓，扑住
len: 24  is_ascii: True      perfume
n.   香水
len: 33  is_ascii: True      sarcastically
adv. 讽刺地
len: 29  is_ascii: True      exempt
adj. 被免除的
len: 18  is_ascii: True      duty
n.   税
len: 20  is_ascii: True      gel
n.   凝胶
len: 27  is_ascii: True      mixture
n.   混合物
len: 24  is_ascii: True      unscrew
v.   拧开
len: 24  is_ascii: True      nostril
n.   鼻孔
len: 22  is_ascii: True      chalk
n.   粉笔
len: 24  is_ascii: True      baggage
n.   行李
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1372  is_ascii: True     Most of us have formed an unrealistic picture of life on a desert island. We sometimes imagine a desert island to be a sort of paradise where the sun always shines. Life there is simple and good. Ripe fruit falls from the trees and you never have to work. The other side of the picture is quite the opposite. Life on a desert island is wretched. You either starve to death or live like Robinson Crusoe, Waiting for a boat which never comes. Perhaps there is an element of truth in both these pictures, but few us have had the opportunity to find out.
    Two men who recently spent five days on a coral island wished they had stayed there longer. They were taking a badly damaged boat from the Virgin Islands to Miami to have it repaired. During the journey, their boat began to sink. They quickly loaded a small rubber dinghy with food, matches, and cans of beer and rowed for a few miles across the Caribbean until they arrived at a tiny coral island. There were hardly any trees on the island and there was no water, but this did not prove to be a problem. The men collected rainwater in the rubber dinghy. As they had brought a spear gun with them, they had plenty to eat. They caught lobster and fish every day，and, as one of them put it 'ate like kings'. When a passing tanker rescued them five days later, both men were genuinely sorry that they had to leave.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 30  is_ascii: True      desert island
     荒岛
len: 31  is_ascii: True      unrealistic
adj. 不真实
len: 34  is_ascii: True      paradise
n.   天堂，乐士
len: 40  is_ascii: True      wretched
adj. 可怜的，艰苦的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      starve
v.   挨饿
len: 24  is_ascii: True      element
n.   成分
len: 28  is_ascii: True      opportunity
n.   机会
len: 22  is_ascii: True      coral
n.   珊瑚
len: 40  is_ascii: True      Virgin Islands
     维尔京群岛
len: 52  is_ascii: True      Miami
n.   迈阿密（美国最南的城市）
len: 35  is_ascii: True      dinghy
n.   救生筏，小船
len: 32  is_ascii: True      Caribbean
n.   加勒比海
len: 29  is_ascii: True      spear gun
     捕鱼枪
len: 24  is_ascii: True      lobster
n.   龙虾
len: 23  is_ascii: True      tanker
n.   油轮
len: 29  is_ascii: True      genuinely
adv. 由衷地
len: 90  is_ascii: True      Robinson Crusoe
     鲁滨孙.克鲁索（小说《鲁滨孙漂流记》主人公）
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1346  is_ascii: True     After her husband had gone to work. Mrs. Richards sent her children to school and went upstairs to her bedroom. She was too excited to do any housework that morning, for in the evening she would be going to a fancy-dress part with her husband. She intended to dress up as a ghost and as she had made her costume the night before, she was impatient to try it on. Though the costume consisted only of a sheet, it was very effective. After putting it on, Mrs. Richards went downstairs. She wanted to find out whether it would be comfortable to wear.
    Just as Mrs. Richards was entering the dinning room, there was a knock on the front door. She knew that it must be the baker. She had told him to come straight in if ever she failed to open the door and to leave the bread on the kitchen table. Not wanting to frighten the poor man, Mrs. Richards quickly hid in the small storeroom under the stairs. She heard the front door open and heavy footsteps in the hall. Suddenly the door of the storeroom was opened and a man entered. Mrs. Richards realized that it must be the man from the Electricity Board who had come to read the metre. She tried to explain the situation, saying 'It's only me', but it was too late. The man let out cry and jumped back several paces. When Mrs. Richards walked towards him, he fled, slamming the door behind him.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 27  is_ascii: True      costume
n.   化装服
len: 33  is_ascii: True      consist
v.   由……组成
len: 22  is_ascii: True      sheet
n.   被单
len: 53  is_ascii: True      effective
adj. 有明显效果的，有作用的
len: 22  is_ascii: True      metre
n.   电表
len: 21  is_ascii: True      pace
n.   一步
len: 33  is_ascii: True      lee (fled, fled)
v.   逃走
len: 27  is_ascii: True      slam
v.   砰地关上
len: 13  is_ascii: True 
参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1380  is_ascii: True     There was a tine when the owners of shops and businesses in Chicago that to pay large sums of money to gangsters in return for 'protection.' If the money was not paid promptly, the gangsters would quickly put a man out of business by destroying his shop. Obtaining 'protection money' is not a modern crime. As long ago as the fourteenth century, an Englishman, Sir John Hawkwood, made the remarkable discovery that people would rather pay large sums of money than have their life work destroyed by gangsters.
    Six hundred years ago, Sir Johan Hawkwood arrived in Italy with a band of soldiers and settled near Florence. He soon made a name for himself and came to be known to the Italians as Giovanni Acuto. Whenever the Italian city-states were at war with each other, Hawkwood used to hire his soldiers to princes who were willing to pay the high price he demanded. In times of peace, when business was bad, Hawkwood and his men would march into a city-state and, after burning down a few farms, would offer to go away protection money was paid to them. Hawkwood made large sums of money in this way. In spite of this, the Italians regarded him as a sort of hero. When he died at the age of eighty, the Florentines gave him a state funeral and had a pictured with as dedicated to the memory of 'the most valiant soldier and most notable leader, Signor Giovanni Haukodue.'
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 32  is_ascii: True      gangster
n.   歹徒,强盗
len: 41  is_ascii: True      Chicago
n.   芝加哥(美国城市)
len: 27  is_ascii: True      protection
n.   保护
len: 28  is_ascii: True      promptly
adv. 准时地
len: 31  is_ascii: True      destroy
v.   毁掉;消灭
len: 33  is_ascii: True      remarkable
adj. 不寻常的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      hand 
n.   帮,团伙
len: 48  is_ascii: True      Florence
n.   佛罗伦萨(意大利城市)
len: 35  is_ascii: True      city-state
n.   (古代)城邦
len: 28  is_ascii: True      hire
v.   租出,雇给
len: 30  is_ascii: True      prince
n.   君主,诸候
len: 36  is_ascii: True      Florentine
n.   佛罗伦萨人
len: 24  is_ascii: True      funeral
n.   葬礼
len: 35  is_ascii: True      dedicate
v.   奉献,题献给
len: 23  is_ascii: True      memory
n.   纪念
len: 27  is_ascii: True      valiant
adj. 英勇的
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1422  is_ascii: True     Children always appreciate small gifts of money. Mum or dad, of course, provide a regular supply of pocket money, but uncles and ants are always a source of extra income. With some children, small sums go a long way. If fifty pence pieces are not exchanged for sweets, they rattle for months inside money boxes. Only very thrifty children manage to fill up a money box. For most of them, fifty pence is a small price to pay for a nice big bar of chocolate.
    My nephew, George, has a money box but it is always empty. Very few of the fifty pence pieces and pound coins I have given him have found their way there. I gave him fifty pence yesterday and advised him to save it. Instead he bought himself fifty pence worth of trouble. On his way to the sweet shop, he dropped his fifty pence and it bounced along the pavement and then disappeared down a drain. George took off his jacket, rolled up his sleeves and pushed is right arm through the drain cover. He could not find his fifty pence piece anywhere, and what is more, he could no get his arm out. A crowd of people gathered round him and a lady rubbed his arm with soap and butter, but George was firmly stuck. The fire brigade was called and two fire fighter freed George using a special type of grease. George was not too upset by his experience because the lady who owns the sweet shop heard about his troubles and rewarded him with large box of chocolates.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 36  is_ascii: True      appreciate
v.   欣赏，感激
len: 32  is_ascii: True      pocket money
     零用钱
len: 27  is_ascii: True      thrifty
adj. 节约的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      nephew
n.   侄子，外甥
len: 32  is_ascii: True      bounce
v.   弹起，跳起
len: 28  is_ascii: True      pavement
n.   人行道
len: 61  is_ascii: True      stick (stuck, stuck)
v.   卡住，夹住，不能再动
len: 39  is_ascii: True      brigade
n.   旅，（消防）队
len: 26  is_ascii: True      grease
n.   润滑油
len: 13  is_ascii: True 
参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1362  is_ascii: True     Mary and her husband Dimitri lived in the tiny village of Perachora in southern Greece. One of Mary's prize possessions was a little white lamb which her husband had given her. She kept it tied to a tree in a field during the day and went to fetch it every evening. One evening, however, the lamb was missing. The rope had been cut, so it was obvious that the lamb had been stolen.
    When Dimitri came in from the fields, his wife told him what had happened. Dimitri at once set out to find the thief. He knew it would not prove difficult in such a small village. After telling several of his friends about the theft, Dimitri found out that his neighbour, Aleko, had suddenly acquired a new lamb. Dimitri immediately went to Aleko's house and angrily accused him of stealing the lamb. He told him he had better return it or he would call the police. Aleko denied taking it and led Dimitri into his backyard. It was true that he had just bought a lamb, he explained, but his lamb was black. Ashamed of having acted so rashly, Dimitri apologized to Aleko for having accused him. While they were talking it began to rain and Dimitri stayed in Aleko's house until the rain stopped. When he went outside half an hour later, he was astonished to find the little black lamb was almost white. Its wool, which had been dyed black, had been washed clean by the rain!
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 38  is_ascii: True      prize
adj. 珍贵的，宝贵的 
len: 23  is_ascii: True      tie
v.   拴，系
len: 40  is_ascii: True      theft
n.   偷盗行为，偷盗案
len: 23  is_ascii: True      accuse
v.   指控
len: 21  is_ascii: True      deny
v.   否认
len: 39  is_ascii: True      ashamed
adj. 感到羞耻，惭愧
len: 26  is_ascii: True      apologize
v.   道歉
len: 17  is_ascii: True      dye
v.   染
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 119  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
How is the bridge supported?
len: 1444  is_ascii: True     Verrazano, an Italian about whom little is known, sailed into New York Harbour in 1524 and named it Angouleme. He described it as 'a very agreeable situation located within two small hills in the midst of which flowed a great river.' Though Verrazano is by no means considered to be a great explorer, his name will probably remain immortal, for on November 21st, 1964, the longest suspension bridge in the world was named after him.
    The Verrazano Bridge, which was designed by Othmar Ammann, joins Brooklyn to Staten Island. It has a span of 4,260 feet. The bridge is so long that the shape of the earth had to be taken into account by its designer. Two great towers support four huge cables. The towers are built on immense underwater platforms make of steel and concrete. The platforms extend to a depth of over 100 feet under the sea. These alone took sixteen months to build. Above the surface of the water, the towers rise to a height of nearly 700 feet. They support the cables from which the bridge has been suspended. Each of the four cables contains 26,108 lengths of wire. It has been estimated that if the bridge were packed with cars, it would still only be carrying a third of its total capacity. However, size and strength are not the only important things about this bridge. Despite its immensity, it is both simple and elegant, fulfilling its designer's dream to create 'an enormous object drawn as faintly as possible'.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 31  is_ascii: True      suspension 
n.   悬，吊
len: 29  is_ascii: True      agreeable
adj. 宜人的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      situation
n.   地点，地方
len: 23  is_ascii: True      locate
v.   位于
len: 47  is_ascii: True      immortal 
adj. 永生的，流芳百世的
len: 52  is_ascii: True      Brooklyn
n.   布鲁克林（纽约一区名）
len: 35  is_ascii: True      Staten
n.   斯塔顿（岛）
len: 21  is_ascii: True      span
n.   跨度
len: 22  is_ascii: True      cable
n.   缆索
len: 28  is_ascii: True      concrete
n.   混凝土
len: 24  is_ascii: True      suspend
v.   悬挂
len: 26  is_ascii: True      length
n.   根，段
len: 25  is_ascii: True      estimate
v.   估计
len: 28  is_ascii: True      capacity
n.   承受量
len: 26  is_ascii: True      immensity
n.   巨大
len: 33  is_ascii: True      elegant
adj. 优美别致的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      faintly
adv. 微细地
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1502  is_ascii: True     Modern sculpture rarely surprises us any more. The idea that modern art can only be seen in museums is mistaken. Even people who take no interest in art cannot have failed to notice examples of modern sculpture on display in public places. Strange forms stand in gardens, and outside buildings and shops. We have got quite used to them. Some so-called 'modern' pieces have been on display for nearly eighty years.
    In spite of this, some people -- including myself -- were surprise by a recent exhibition of modern sculpture. The first thing I saw when I entered the art gallery was a notice which said: 'Do not touch the exhibits. Some of them are dangerous!' The objects on display were pieces of moving sculpture. Oddly shaped forms that are suspended form the ceiling and move in response to a gust of wind are quite familiar to everybody. These objects, however, were different. Lined up against the wall, there were long thin wires attached to metal spheres. The spheres had been magnetized and attracted or repelled each other all the time. In the centre of the hall, there were a number of tall structures which contained coloured lights. These lights flickered continuously like traffic lights which have gone mad. Sparks were emitted from small black boxes and red lamps flashed on and off angrily. It was rather like an exhibition of prehistoric electronic equipment. These peculiar forms not only seemed designed to shock people emotionally, but to give them electric shocks as well!
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 24  is_ascii: True      current
n.   电流
len: 26  is_ascii: True      sculpture
n.   雕塑
len: 28  is_ascii: True      mistaken
adj. 错误的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      gallery
n.   美术馆
len: 36  is_ascii: True      exhibit
n.   展品，陈列品
len: 25  is_ascii: True      oddly
adv. 古怪的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      attach
v.   连，系
len: 23  is_ascii: True      sphere
n.   球体
len: 29  is_ascii: True      magnetize
v.   使磁化
len: 22  is_ascii: True      repel
v.   排斥
len: 24  is_ascii: True      flicker
v.   闪烁
len: 21  is_ascii: True      emit
v.   放射
len: 22  is_ascii: True      flash
v.   闪光
len: 46  is_ascii: True      prehistoric
adj. 史前的，老掉牙的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      electronic
adj. 电子的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      peculiar
adj. 奇异的
len: 40  is_ascii: True      shock
v.   令人震惊，刺激人
len: 31  is_ascii: True      emotionally
adv. 事情上
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1464  is_ascii: True     Kidnappers are rarely interested in animals, but they recently took considerable interest in Mrs. Eleanor Ramsay's cat. Mrs. Eleanor Ramsay, a very wealthy old lady, has shared a flat with her cat, Rastus, for a great many years. Rastus leads an orderly life. He usually takes a short walk in the evenings and is always home by seven o'clock. One evening, however, he failed to arrive. Mrs. Ramsay got very worried. She looked everywhere for him but could not find him.
    There days after Rastus' disappearance, Mrs. Ramsay received an anonymous letter. The writer stated that Rastus was in safe hands and would be returned immediately if Mrs. Ramsay paid a ransom of $1,000. Mrs. Ramsay was instructed to place the money in a cardboard box and to leave it outside her door. At first she decided to go to the police, but fearing that she would never see Rastus again -- the letter had made that quite clear -- she changed her mind. She withdrew $1000 from her bank and followed the kidnapper's instructions. The next morning, the box had disappeared but Mrs. Ramsay was sure that the kidnapper would keep his word. Sure enough, Rastus arrived punctually at seven o'clock that evening. He looked very well though he was rather thirsty, for he drank half a bottle of milk. The police were astounded when Mrs. Ramsay told them what she had done. She explained that Rastus was very dear to her. Considering the amount she paid, he was dear in more ways than one!
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 48  is_ascii: True      dear
adj. 亲爱的，珍贵的；昂贵的
len: 41  is_ascii: True      kidnapper
n.   绑架者，拐骗者
len: 35  is_ascii: True      considerable
adj. 相当大的
len: 36  is_ascii: True      wealthy
adj. 富的，有钱的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      orderly
adj. 有规律的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      disappearance
n.   失踪
len: 29  is_ascii: True      anonymous
adj. 匿名的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      ransom
n.   赎金
len: 29  is_ascii: True      cardboard
n.   硬纸板
len: 61  is_ascii: True      withdraw(withdrew, withdrawn)
v.   （从银行）取钱
len: 30  is_ascii: True      punctually
adv. 准时地
len: 27  is_ascii: True      astound
v.   使吃惊
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1382  is_ascii: True     In 1908 Lord Northcliffe offered a prize of $1,000 to the first man who would fly across the English Channel. Over a year passed before the first attempt was made. On July 19th, 1909, in the early morning, Hubert Latham took off from the French coast in his plane the 'Antoinette IV.' He had travelled only seven miles across the Channel when his engine failed and he was forced to land on sea. The 'Antoinette' floated on the water until Latham was picked up by a ship.
    Two days alter, Louis Bleriot arrived near Calais with a plane called 'No. XI'. Bleriot had been making planes since 1905 and this was his lattes model. A week before, he had completed a successful overland flight during which he covered twenty-six miles. Latham, however, did not give up easily. He, too, arrived near Calais on the same day with a new  'Antoinette'. It looked as if there would be an exciting race across the Channel. Both planes were going to take off on July 25th, but Latham failed to get up early enough, After making a short test flight at 4,15 a.m., Bleriot set off half an hour later. His great flight lasted thirty-seven minutes. When he landed near Dover, the first person to greet him was a local policeman. Latham made another attempt a week later and got within half a mile of Dover, but he was unlucky again. His engine failed and he landed on the sea for the second time.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 24  is_ascii: True      pioneer
n.   先驱
len: 54  is_ascii: True      lord
n.   对（英国）贵族的尊称；勋爵
len: 41  is_ascii: True      Calais
n.   加来（法国港市）
len: 28  is_ascii: True      overland
adj. 陆上的
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2030  is_ascii: True     Boxing matches were very popular in England two hundred years ago. In those days, boxers fought with bare fists for prize money. Because of this, they were known as 'prizefighters'. However, boxing was very crude, for these were no rules and a prizefighter could be seriously injured or even killed during a match.
    One of the most colourful figures in boxing history was Daniel Mendoza, who was born in 1764. The use of gloves was not introduced until 1860, when the Marquis of Queensberry drew up the first set of rules. Though he was technically a prizefighter, Mendoza did much to change crude prizefighting into a sport, for he brought science to the game. In this day, Mendoza enjoyed tremendous popularity. He was adored by rich and poor alike.
    Mendoza rose to fame swiftly after a boxing match when he was only fourteen years old. This attracted the attention of Richard Humphries who was then the most eminent boxer in England. He offered to train Mendoza and his young pupil was quick to learn. In fact, Mendoza soon became so successful that Humphries turned against him. The two men quarrelled bitterly and it was clear that the argument could only be settled by a fight. A match was held at Stilton, where both men fought for an hour. The public bet a great deal of money on Mendoza, but he was defeated. Mendoza met Humphries in the ring on a later occasion and he lost for a second time. It was not until his third match in 1790 that he finally beat Humphries and became Champion of England. Meanwhile, he founded a highly successful Academy and even Lord Byron became one of his pupils. He earned enormous sums of money and was paid as much as $100 for a single appear one of his pupils. He earned enormous sums of money and was paid as much as $100 for a single appearance. Despite this, he was so extravagant that he was always in debt. After he was defeated by a boxer called Gentleman Jackson, he was quickly forgotten. He was sent to prison for failing to pay his debts and died in poverty in 1836.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 24  is_ascii: True      Boxing 
n.   拳击
len: 25  is_ascii: True      boxer
n.   拳击手
len: 24  is_ascii: True      bare
adj. 赤裸的
len: 72  is_ascii: True      prizefighter 
n.   职业拳击手（尤指古时赤手拳击手）
len: 25  is_ascii: True      crude
adj. 粗野的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      marquis
n.   侯爵
len: 49  is_ascii: True      technically
adv. 严格根据法律意义地
len: 24  is_ascii: True      science
n.   科学
len: 27  is_ascii: True      popularity
n.   名望
len: 31  is_ascii: True      adore
v.   崇拜，爱戴
len: 25  is_ascii: True      alike
adv. 一样地
len: 21  is_ascii: True      fame
n.   名声
len: 39  is_ascii: True      eminent
adj. 著名的，杰出的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      bitterly
adv. 厉害地
len: 20  is_ascii: True      bet
v.   打赌
len: 30  is_ascii: True      academy
n.   专业学校
len: 43  is_ascii: True      extravagant
adj. 浪费的，奢移的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      poverty
n.   贫困
len: 1864  is_ascii: True 参考译文
    两百年前，拳击比赛在英国非常盛行。当时，拳击手们不戴手套，为争夺奖金而搏斗。因此，他们被称作“职业拳击手”。不过，拳击是十分野蛮的，因为当时没有任何比赛规则，职业拳击手有可能在比赛中受重伤，甚至丧命。
    拳击史上最引人注目的人物之一是丹尼尔.门多萨，他生于1764年。1860年昆斯伯里侯爵第一次为拳击比赛制定了规则，拳击比赛这才用上了手套。虽然门多萨严格来讲不过是个职业拳击手，但在把这种粗野的拳击变成一种体育运动方面，他作出了重大贡献。是他把科学引进了这项运动。门多萨在的全盛时期深受大家欢迎，无论是富人还是穷人都对他祟拜备至。
     门多萨在14岁时参加一场拳击赛后一举成名。这引起当时英国拳坛名将理查德.汉弗莱斯的注意。他主动提出教授门多萨，而年少的门多萨一学就会。事实上，门多萨不久便名声大振，致使汉弗莱斯与他反目为敌。两个人争吵不休，显而易见，只有较量一番才能解决问题。于是两人在斯蒂尔顿设下赛场，厮打了一个小时。公众把大笔赌注下到了门多萨身上，但他却输了。后来，门多萨与汉弗莱斯再次在拳击场上较量，门多萨又输了一场。直到1790年他们第3次对垒，门多萨才终于击败汉弗莱斯，成了全英拳击冠军。同时，他建立了一所拳击学校，办得很成功，连拜伦勋爵也成了他的学生。门多萨挣来大笔大笔的钱，一次出场费就多可达100英镑。尽管收入不少，但他挥霍无度，经常债台高筑。他在被一个叫杰克逊绅士的拳击手击败后很快被遗忘。他因无力还债而被捕入狱，最后于1836年在贫困中死去。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1874  is_ascii: True     Some plays are so successful that they run for years on end, In many ways, this is unfortunate for the poor actors who are required to go on repeating the same lines night after night. One would expect them to know their parts by heart and never have cause to falter. Yet this is not always the case.
    A famous actor in a highly successful play was once cast in the role of an aristocrat who had been imprisoned in the Bastille for twenty years. In the last act, a gaoler would always come on to the stage with a letter which he would hand to the prisoner. Even though the noble was expected to read the letter at each performance, he always insisted that it should be written out in full.
    One night, the gaoler decided to play a joke on his colleague to find out if, after so many performances, he had managed to learn the contents of the letter by heart. The curtain went up on the final act of the play and revealed the aristocrat sitting alone behind bars in his dark cell. Just then, the gaoler appeared with the precious letter in his bands. He entered the cell and presented the letter to the aristocrat. But the copy he gave him had not been written out in full as usual. It was simply a blank sheet of paper. The gaoler looked on eagerly, anxious to see if his fellow actor had at last learnt his lines. The noble stared at the blank sheet of paper for a few seconds. Then, squinting his eyes, he said: 'The light is dim. Read the letter to me'. And he promptly handed the sheet of paper to the gaoler. Finding that he could not remember a word of the letter either, the gaoler replied: 'The light is indeed dim, sire, I must get my glasses.' With this, he hurried off the stage. Much to the aristocrat's amusement, the gaoler returned a few moments later with a pair of glasses and the usual copy of the letter with he proceeded to read to the prisoner.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 64  is_ascii: True      run (ran, run)
v.   （戏剧，电影等）连演，连映
len: 83  is_ascii: True      lines
n.   （剧本中的）台词
  
     part
n.   剧中的角色，台词
len: 35  is_ascii: True      falter
v.   支吾，结巴说
len: 52  is_ascii: True      cast (cast, cast)
v.   连派……扮演角色
len: 21  is_ascii: True      role
n.   角色
len: 27  is_ascii: True      aristocrat
n.   贵族
len: 25  is_ascii: True      imprison
v.   关押
len: 31  is_ascii: True      Bastille
n.   巴士底狱
len: 35  is_ascii: True      gaoler
n.   监狱长，看守
len: 26  is_ascii: True      colleague
n.   同事
len: 42  is_ascii: True      curtain
n.   （舞台上的）幕布
len: 26  is_ascii: True      reveal
v.   使显露
len: 36  is_ascii: True      cell
n.   单人监房，监号
len: 25  is_ascii: True      blank
adj. 空白的
len: 41  is_ascii: True      squint
v.   眯着（眼）看，瞄
len: 20  is_ascii: True      dim
adj. 昏暗
len: 36  is_ascii: True      sire
n.   （古用法）陛下
len: 30  is_ascii: True      proceed
v.   继续进行
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1885  is_ascii: True     People become quite illogical when they try to decide what can be eaten and what cannot be eaten. If you lived in the Mediterranean, for instance, you would consider octopus a great delicacy. You would not be able to understand why some people find it repulsive. On the other hand, your stomach would turn at the idea of frying potatoes in animal fat -- the normally accepted practice in many northern countries. The sad truth is that most of us have been brought up to eat certain foods and we stick to them all our lives.
    No creature has received more praise and abuse than the common garden snail. Cooked in wine, snails are a great luxury in various parts of the world. There are countless people who, ever since their early years, have learned to associate snails with food. My friend, Robert, lives in a country where snails are despised. As his flat is in a large town, he has no garden of his own. For years he has been asking me to collect snails from my garden and take them to him. The idea never appealed to me very much, but one day, after heavy shower, I happened to be walking in my garden when I noticed a huge number of snails taking a stroll on some of my prize plants. Acting on a sudden impulse, I collected several dozen, put them in a paper bag, and took them to Robert. Robert was delighted to see me and equally pleased with my little gift. I left the bag in the hall and Robert and I went into the living room where we talked for a couple of hours. I had forgotten all about the snails when Robert suddenly said that I must stay to dinner. Snails would, of course, be the main dish. I did not fancy the idea and I reluctantly followed Robert out of the room. To our dismay, we saw that there were snails everywhere: they had escaped from the paper bag and had taken complete possession of the hall! I have never been able to look at a snail since then.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 31  is_ascii: True      poison (title)
n.   毒药
len: 50  is_ascii: True      illogical
adj. 不合逻辑的，无章法的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      octopus
n.   章鱼
len: 34  is_ascii: True      delicacy
n.   美味，佳肴
len: 53  is_ascii: True      repulsive
adj. 令人反感的，令人生厌的
len: 21  is_ascii: True      stomach
n.   胃
len: 36  is_ascii: True      turn
v.   感到恶心，翻胃
len: 20  is_ascii: True      fry
v.   油炸
len: 36  is_ascii: True     fat
n.  （动物，植物）油
len: 31  is_ascii: True      abuse
n.   辱骂，责骂
len: 22  is_ascii: True      snail
n.   蜗牛
len: 35  is_ascii: True      luxury
n.   奢移品，珍品
len: 29  is_ascii: True      associate
v.   联想到
len: 25  is_ascii: True      despise
v.   鄙视 
len: 29  is_ascii: True      appeal
v.   引起兴致
len: 23  is_ascii: True      shower
n.   阵雨
len: 32  is_ascii: True      stroll
n.   溜达，散步
len: 24  is_ascii: True      impulse
n.   冲动
len: 30  is_ascii: True      dozen
n.   12个，一打
len: 31  is_ascii: True      fancy
v.   喜爱，喜欢
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2139  is_ascii: True     We often read in novels how a seemingly respectable person or family has some terrible secret which has been concealed from strangers for years. The English language possesses a vivid saying to describe this sort of situation. The terrible secret is called 'a skeleton in the cupboard'. At some dramatic moment in the story, the terrible secret becomes known and a reputation is ruined. The reader's hair stands on end when he reads in the final pages of the novel that the heroine a dear old lady who had always been so kind to everybody, had, in her youth, poisoned every one of her five husbands.
    It is all very well for such things to occur in fiction. To varying degrees, we all have secrets which we do not want even our closest friends to learn, but few of us have skeletons in the cupboard. The only person I know who has a skeleton in the cupboard is George Carlton, and he is very pound of the fact. George studied medicine in his youth. Instead of becoming a doctor, however, he became a successful writer of detective stories. I once spend an uncomfortable weekend which I shall never forget at his house. George showed me to the guestroom which, he said, was rarely used. He told me to unpack my things and then come down to dinner. After I had stacked my shirts and underclothes in two empty drawers, I decided to hang one of the tow suits I had brought with me in the cupboard. I opened the cupboard door and then stood in front of two suits I had brought with me in the cupboard. I opened the cupboard door and then stood in front of it suits I had brought with me in the cupboard. I opened the cupboard door and then stood in front of it petrified. A skeleton was dangling before my eyes. The sudden movement of the door made it sway slightly and it gave me the impression that it was about to leap out at me. Dropping my suit, I dashed downstairs to tell George. This was worse than "a terrible secret'; this was a read skeleton! But George was unsympathetic. 'Oh, that,' he said with a smile as if he were talking about an old friend. 'That's Sebastian. You forget that I was a medical student once upon a time.'
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 25  is_ascii: True      skeleton
n.   骷髅
len: 32  is_ascii: True      seemingly
adv. 表面上地
len: 43  is_ascii: True      respectable
adj. 体面的，雅观的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      conceal
v.   隐藏，隐瞒
len: 25  is_ascii: True      vivid
adj. 生动的
len: 52  is_ascii: True      dramatic
adj. 令人激动的，扣人心弦的
len: 21  is_ascii: True      ruin
v.   毁坏
len: 30  is_ascii: True      heroine
n.   女主人公
len: 24  is_ascii: True      fiction
n.   小说
len: 27  is_ascii: True      varying
adj. 不同的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      medicine
n.   医学
len: 50  is_ascii: True      guestroom
n.   （家庭中的）来客住房
len: 38  is_ascii: True      unpack
vt.  （从箱中）取出
len: 46  is_ascii: True      stack
v.   （整齐地）堆放，排放
len: 29  is_ascii: True      underclothes
n.   内衣
len: 23  is_ascii: True      drawer
n.   抽屉
len: 27  is_ascii: True      petrify
v.   使惊呆
len: 23  is_ascii: True      dangle
v.   悬挂
len: 21  is_ascii: True      sway
v.   摇摆
len: 57  is_ascii: True      unsympathetic
adj. 不表同情的，无动于衷的
len: 28  is_ascii: True 
     medical
adj. 医学的
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1948  is_ascii: True     One of the most famous sailing ships of the nineteenth century, the Cutty Sark, can still be seen at Greewich. She stands on dry land and is visited by thousands of people each year. She serves as an impressive reminder of the great ships of past. Before they were replaced by steamships, sailing vessels like the Cutty Sark were used to carry tea from China and wool from Australia. The Cutty Sark was one the fastest sailing ships that has ever been built. The only other ship to match her was the Thermopylae. Both these ships set out from Shanghai on June 18th, 1872 on an exciting race to England. This race, which went on for exactly four exactly four months, was the last of its kind. It marked the end of the great tradition of ships with sails and the beginning of a new era.
    The first of the two ships to reach Java after the race had begun was the Thermopylae, but on the Indian Ocean, the Cutty Sark took lead. It seemed certain that she would be the first ship home, but during the race she had a lot of bad luck. In August, she was struck by a very heavy storm during which her rudder was torn away. The Cutty Sark rolled from side to side and it became impossible to steer her. A temporary rudder was made on board from spare planks and it was fitted with great difficulty. This greatly reduced the speed of the ship, for there was a danger that if she traveled too quickly, this rudder would be torn away as well. Because of this, the Cutty Sark lost her lead. After crossing the Equator, the captain called in at a port to have a new rudder fitted, but by now the Thermopylae was over five hundred miles ahead. Though the new rudder was fitted at tremendous speed, it was impossible for the Cutty Sark to win. She arrived in England a week after the Thermopylae. Even this was remarkable, considering that she had had so many delays. These is no doubt that if she had not lost her rudder she would have won the race easily.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 42  is_ascii: True      impressive
adj. 给人深刻印象的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      steamship
n.   蒸汽轮船
len: 35  is_ascii: True      vessel
n.   轮船，大木船
len: 29  is_ascii: True      era
n.   时期，时代
len: 48  is_ascii: True      Java
n.   爪哇（印度尼西亚一岛）
len: 21  is_ascii: True      rudder
n.   舵 
len: 30  is_ascii: True      roll
v.   颠簸，摇摆
len: 28  is_ascii: True      steer
v.   掌握方向
len: 29  is_ascii: True      temporary
adj. 临时的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      plank
n.   大块木板
len: 20  is_ascii: True      fit
v.   安装
len: 24  is_ascii: True      Equator
n.   赤道
len: 22  is_ascii: True      delay
n.   耽误
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1985  is_ascii: True     No one can avoid being influenced by advertisements. Much as we may pride ourselves on our good taste, we are no longer free to choose the things we want, for advertising exerts a subtle influence on us. In their efforts to persuade us to buy this or that product, advertisers have made a close study of human nature and have classified all our little weaknesses.
    Advertisers discovered years ago that all of us love to get something for nothing. An advertisement which begins with the magic word FREE can rarely go wrong. These days, advertisers not only offer free samples, but free cars, free houses, and free trips round the world as well. They devise hundreds of competitions which will enable us to win huge sums of money. Radio and television have made it possible for advertisers to capture the attention of millions of people in this way.
    During a radio programme, a company of biscuit manufacturers once asked listeners to bake biscuits and send them to their factory. They offered to pay $10 a pound for the biggest biscuit baked by a listener. The response to this competition was tremendous. Before long, biscuits of all shapes and sizes began arriving at the factory. One lady brought in a biscuit on a wheelbarrow. It weighed nearly 500 pounds. A little later, a man came along with a biscuit which occupied the whole boot of his car. All the biscuits that were sent were carefully weighed. The largest was 713 pounds. It seemed certain that this would win the prize. But just before the competition closed, a lorry arrived at the factory with a truly colossal biscuit which weighed 2,400 pounds. It had been baked by a college student who had used over 1,000 pounds of flour, 800 pounds of sugar, 200 pounds of fat, and 400 pounds of various other ingredients. It was so heavy that a crane had to be used to remove it from the lorry. The manufacturers had to pay more money than they had anticipated, or they bought the biscuit from the student for $24,000.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 27  is_ascii: True      influence
v.   影响 
len: 22  is_ascii: True      pride
v.   骄傲
len: 25  is_ascii: True      taste
n.   鉴赏力
len: 22  is_ascii: True      exert
v.   施加
len: 44  is_ascii: True      subtle
aj.  微妙的，难以捉摸的
len: 36  is_ascii: True      advertiser
n.   做广告的人
len: 25  is_ascii: True      classify
v.   分类
len: 31  is_ascii: True      magic
adj. 有奇妙作用
len: 23  is_ascii: True      sample
n.   样品
len: 32  is_ascii: True      devise
v.   设计，想出
len: 33  is_ascii: True      capture
v.   吸引，赢得
len: 47  is_ascii: True      manufacturer
n.   生产厂家，制造商
len: 37  is_ascii: True      wheelbarrow
n.   独轮手推车
len: 44  is_ascii: True      boot
n.  （汽车尾部的）行李箱
len: 27  is_ascii: True      ingredient
n.   配料
len: 25  is_ascii: True      crane
n.   起重机
len: 36  is_ascii: True      anticipate
v.   预期，预料
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1990  is_ascii: True     It has been said that everyone lives by selling something. In the light of this statement, teachers live by selling knowledge, philosophers by selling wisdom and priests by selling spiritual comfort. Though it may be possible to measure the value of material good in terms of money, it is extremely difficult to estimate the true value of the services which people perform for us. There are times when we would willingly give everything we possess to save our lives, yet we might grudge paying a surgeon a high fee for offering us precisely this service. The conditions of society are such that skills have to be paid for in the same way that goods are paid for at a shop. Everyone has something to sell.
    Tramps seem to be the only exception to this general rule. Beggars almost sell themselves as human being to arouse the pity of passers-by. But real tramps are not beggars. They have nothing to sell and require nothing from others. In seeking independence, they do not sacrifice their human dignity. A tramp may ask you for money, but he will never ask you to feel sorry for him. He has deliberately chosen to lead the life he leads and is fully aware of the consequences. He may never be sure where the next meal is coming from, but his is free from the thousands of anxieties which afflict other people. His few material possessions make it possible for him to move from place to place with ease. By having to sleep in the open, he gets far closer to the world of nature than most of us ever do. He may hunt, beg, or stead occasionally to keep himself alive; he may even, in times of real need, do a little work; but he will never sacrifice his freedom. We often speak of my even, in times of real need, do a little work; but he will never sacrifice his freedom. We often speak of tramps with contempt and put them in the same class as beggars, but how many of us can honestly say that we have not felt a little envious of their simple way of life and their freedom from care?
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 31  is_ascii: True      philosopher
n.   哲学家
len: 23  is_ascii: True      wisdom
n.   智慧
len: 23  is_ascii: True      priest
n.   牧师
len: 32  is_ascii: True      spiritual
adj. 精神上的
len: 41  is_ascii: True      grudge
v.   不愿给，舍不得给
len: 30  is_ascii: True      surgeon
n.   外科大夫
len: 50  is_ascii: True      passer-by
n.   过路人（复数 passers-by)
len: 24  is_ascii: True      dignity
n.   尊严
len: 32  is_ascii: True      deliberately
adv. 故意地
len: 37  is_ascii: True      consequence
n.   后果，结果
len: 36  is_ascii: True      afflict
v.   使苦恼，折磨
len: 21  is_ascii: True      ease
n.   容易
len: 26  is_ascii: True      nature
n.   大自然
len: 28  is_ascii: True      contempt
n.   蔑视的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      envious
adj. 嫉妒的     
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1896  is_ascii: True     Small boats loaded with wares sped to the great liner as she was entering the harbour. Before she had anchored, the men from the boats had climbed on board and the decks were son covered with colourful rugs from Persia, silks from India, copper coffee pots, and beautiful handmade silverware. It was difficult not to be tempted. Many of the tourists on board had begun bargaining with the tradesmen, but I decide not to buy anything until I had disembarked.
    I had no sooner got off the ship than I was assailed by a man who wanted to sell me a diamond ring. I had no intention of buying one, but I could not conceal the fact that I was impressed by the size of the diamonds. Some of them were as big as marbles. The man went to great lengths to prove that the diamonds were real. As we were walking past a shop, he held a diamond firmly against the window and made a deep impression in the glass. It took me over half an hour to get rid of him.
    The next man to approach me was selling expensive pens and watches. I examined one of the pens closely. It certainly looked genuine. At the base of the gold cap, the words 'made in the U.S.A' had been nearly inscribed. The man said that the pen was worth $50, but as a special favour, he would let me have it for $30. I shook my head and held up five fingers indicating that I was willing to pay $5. Gesticulating wildly, the man acted as if he found my offer outrageous, but he eventually reduced the price to $10. Shrugging my shoulders, I began to walk away when, a moment later, he ran after me and thrust the pen into my hands. Though he kept throwing up his arms in despair, he readily accepted the $5 I have him. I felt especially pleased with my wonderful bargain -- until I got back to the ship. No matter how hard I tried, it was impossible to fill this beautiful pen with ink and to this day it has never written a single world!
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 31  is_ascii: True      wares
n.   货物，商品
len: 29  is_ascii: True      anchor
v.   停航下锚
len: 21  is_ascii: True      deck
n.   甲板
len: 27  is_ascii: True      silverware
n.   银器
len: 31  is_ascii: True      tempt
v.   吸引；引诱
len: 30  is_ascii: True      bargain
v.   讨价还价
len: 32  is_ascii: True      disembark
v.   下船上岸
len: 23  is_ascii: True      assail
v.   纠缠
len: 29  is_ascii: True      marble
n.   小玻璃球
len: 31  is_ascii: True      inscribe
v.   刻写，雕
len: 32  is_ascii: True      favour
n.   好处，优惠
len: 46  is_ascii: True      gesticulate
v.   （讲话时）打手势
len: 54  is_ascii: True      outrageous
adj. 出人预料的；令人不悦的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      thrust
v.   硬塞给
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2045  is_ascii: True     Whether we find a joke funny or not largely depends on were we have been brought up. The sense of humour is mysteriously bound up with national characteristics. A Frenchman, for instance, might find it hard to laugh at a Russian joke. In the same way, a Russian might fail to see anything amusing in a joke witch would make an Englishman laugh to tears.
    Most funny stories are based on comic situations. In spite of national differences, certain funny situations have a universal appeal. No matter where you live, you would find it difficult not to laugh at, say, Charlie Chaplin's early films. However, a new type of humour, which stems largely from the U.S., has recently come into fashion. It is called 'sick humour'. Comedians base their jokes on tragic situation like violent death or serious accidents. Many people find this sort of joke distasteful The following example of 'sick humour' will enable you to judge for yourself.
    A man who had broken his right leg was taken to hospital a few weeks before Christmas. From the moment he arrived there, he kept on pestering his doctor to tell him when he would be able to go home. He dreaded having to spend Christmas in hospital. Though the doctors did his best, the patient's recovery was slow. On Christmas Day, the man still had his right leg in plaster. He spent a miserable day in bed thinking of all the fun he was missing. The following day, however, the doctor consoled him by telling him that his chances of being able to leave hospital in time for New Year celebrations were good. The good. The man took heart and, sure enough, on New Years' Eve he was able to hobble along to a party. To compensate for his unpleasant experiences in hospital, the man drank a little more than was good for him. In the process, he enjoyed himself thoroughly and kept telling everybody how much he hated hospitals. He was still mumbling something about hospitals at the end of the party when he slipped on a piece of ice and broke his left leg.
 
New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 36  is_ascii: True      largely
adv. 在很大程度上
len: 37  is_ascii: True      comic
adj. 喜剧的，可笑的
len: 29  is_ascii: True      universal
adj. 普通的
len: 46  is_ascii: True      comedian
n.   滑稽演员，喜剧演员
len: 31  is_ascii: True      distasteful
adj. 讨厌的
len: 38  is_ascii: True      pester
v.   一再要求，纠缠
len: 22  is_ascii: True      dread
v.   惧怕
len: 25  is_ascii: True      recovery
n.   康复
len: 27  is_ascii: True      plaster
n.   熟石膏
len: 33  is_ascii: True      console
v.   安慰，慰问
len: 29  is_ascii: True      hobble
v.   瘸着腿走
len: 27  is_ascii: True      compensate
v.   补偿
len: 29  is_ascii: True      mumble
v.   喃喃而语
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1927  is_ascii: True     For years, villagers believed that Endley Farm was hunted. The farm was owned by two brothers, Joe and Bob Cox. They employed a few farmhands, but no one was willing to work there long. Every time a worker gave up his job, he told the same story. Farm labourers said that they always woke up to find that work had been done overnight. Hay had been cut and cowsheds had been cleaned. A farm worker, who stayed up all night claimed to have seen a figure cutting corn in the moonlight. In time, it became an accepted fact the Cox brothers employed a conscientious ghost that did most of their work for them.
    No one suspected that there might be someone else on the farm who had never been seen. This was indeed the case. A short time ago, villagers were astonished to learn that the ghost of Endley had died. Everyone went to the funeral, for the 'ghost' was none other than Eric Cox, a third brother who was supposed to have died as a young man. After the funeral, Joe and Bob revealed a secret which they had kept for over fifty years.
    Eric had been the eldest son of the family, very much older than his two brothers. He had been obliged to join the army during the Second World War. As he hated army life, he decided to desert his regiment. When he learnt that he would be sent abroad, he returned to the farm and his father hid him until the end of the war. Fearing the authorities, Eric remained in hiding after the war as well. His father told everybody that Eric had been killed in action. The only other people who knew the secret were Joe and Bob. They did not even tell their wives. When their father died, they thought it their duty to keep Eric in hiding. All these years, Eric had lived as a recluse. He used to sleep during the day and work at night, quite unaware of the fact that he had become the ghost of Endley. When he died, however, his brothers found it impossible to keep the secret any longer.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 28  is_ascii: True      labourer
n.   劳动者
len: 32  is_ascii: True      overnight
adv. 一夜期间
len: 20  is_ascii: True      hay
n.   干草
len: 21  is_ascii: True      corn
n.   谷物
len: 26  is_ascii: True      moonlight
n.   月光
len: 33  is_ascii: True      conscientious
adj. 认真的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      suspect
v.   怀疑
len: 41  is_ascii: True      desert
v.   （军队中）开小差
len: 34  is_ascii: True      regiment
n.   （军队）团
len: 23  is_ascii: True      action
n.   战斗
len: 24  is_ascii: True      recluse
n.   隐士
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 141  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
Why did the shop assistant refuse to serve Dickie?
len: 1989  is_ascii: True     True eccentrics never deliberately set out to draw attention to themselves. They disregard social conventions without being conscious that they are doing anything extraordinary. This invariably wins them the love and respect of others, for they add colour to the dull routine of everyday life.
    Up to the time of his death, Richard Colson was one of the most notable figures in our town. He was a shrewd and wealthy businessman, but most people in the town hardly knew anything about this side of his life. He was known to us all as Dickie and his eccentricity had become legendary long before he died.
    Dickie disliked snobs intensely. Though he owned a large car, he hardly ever used it, preferring always to go on foot. Even when it was raining heavily, he refused to carry an umbrella. One day, he walked into an expensive shop after having been caught in a particularly heavy shower. He wanted to buy a $300 watch for his wife, but he was in such a bedraggled condition than an assistant refused to serve him. Dickie left the shop without a word and returned carrying a large cloth bag. As it was extremely heavy, he dumped it on the counter. The assistant asked him to leave, but Dickie paid no attention to him and requested to see the manager. Recognizing who the customer was, the manager was most apologetic and reprimanded the assistant severely. When Dickie was given the watch, the presented the assistant with the cloth bag. It contained $300 in pennies. He insisted on the assistant's counting the money before he left -- 30,000 pennies in all! On another occasion, he invited a number of important critics to see his private collection of modern paintings. This exhibition received a great deal of attention in the press, for though the pictures were supposed to be the work of famous artists, they had in fact been painted by Dickie. It took him four years to stage this elaborate joke simply to prove that critics do not always know what they are talking about.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 27  is_ascii: True      lovable
adj. 可爱的
len: 41  is_ascii: True      eccentric
n.   （行为）古怪人
len: 75  is_ascii: True      disregard
v.   不顾，漠视
  
     convention
n.   习俗，风俗
len: 47  is_ascii: True      conscious
adj. 感觉到的，意识到的
len: 39  is_ascii: True      invariably
adv. 总是，经常地
len: 33  is_ascii: True      routine
n.   常规；惯例
len: 26  is_ascii: True      shrewd
adj. 精明的
len: 29  is_ascii: True      eccentricity
n.   怪僻
len: 32  is_ascii: True      legendary
adj. 传奇般的
len: 48  is_ascii: True      snob
n.   势利小人，谄上欺下的人
len: 29  is_ascii: True      intensely
adv. 强烈地
len: 36  is_ascii: True      bedraggled
adj. 拖泥带水的
len: 42  is_ascii: True      dump
v.   把……砰的一声抛下
len: 30  is_ascii: True      apologetic
adj. 道歉的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      reprimand
v.   训斥
len: 28  is_ascii: True      stage
v.   暗中策划
len: 35  is_ascii: True      elaborate
adj. 精心构思的
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2002  is_ascii: True     The salvage operation had been a complete failure. The small ship, Elkor, which had been searching the Barents Sea for weeks, was on its way home. A radio message from the mainland had been received by the ship's captain instructing him to give up the search. The captain knew that another attempt would be made later, for the sunken ship he was trying to find had been carrying a precious cargo of gold bullion.
    Despite the message, the captain of the Elkor decided to try once more. The sea bed was scoured with powerful nets and there was tremendous excitement on board went a chest was raised from the bottom. Though the crew were at first under the impression that the lost ship had been found, the contents of the chest proved them wrong. What they had in fact found was a ship which had been sunk many years before.
    The chest contained the personal belongings of a seaman, Alan Fielding. There were books, clothing and photographs, together with letters which the seaman had once received from his wife. The captain of the Elkor ordered his men to salvage as much as possible from the wreck. Nothing of value was found, but the numerous items which were brought to the surface proved to be of great interest. From a heavy gun that was raised, the captain realized that the ship must have been a cruiser. In another chest, which contained the belongings of a ship's officer, there was an unfinished letter which had been written on March 14th, 1943. The captain learnt from the letter that the name of the lost ship was the Karen. The most valuable find of all was the ship's log book, parts of which it was still possible to read. From this the captain was able to piece together all the information that had come to light. The Karen had been sailing in a convoy to Russia when she was torpedoed by an enemy submarine. This was later confirmed by naval official at the Ministry of Defiance after the Elkor had returned home. All the items that were found were sent to the War Museum.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 42  is_ascii: True      salvage
v.   救助，营救；打捞
len: 36  is_ascii: True      Barents
n.   巴伦支（海）
len: 26  is_ascii: True      sunken
adj. 沉没的
len: 22  is_ascii: True      cargo
n.   货物
len: 34  is_ascii: True      bullion 
n.   金条；银条
len: 28  is_ascii: True      scour
v.   彻底搜索
len: 25  is_ascii: True      chest
n.   大箱子
len: 46  is_ascii: True      contents
n.   （复数）所装的东西
len: 42  is_ascii: True      belongings
n.   （复数）所有物
len: 21  is_ascii: True      item
n.   物件
len: 27  is_ascii: True      cruiser
n.   巡洋舰
len: 30  is_ascii: True      find
n.   找到的物品
len: 31  is_ascii: True      log book
     航海日志
len: 28  is_ascii: True      piece
v.   拼成整体
len: 23  is_ascii: True      convoy
n.   护航
len: 34  is_ascii: True      torpedo
v.   用鱼雷攻击 
len: 29  is_ascii: True      submarine
n.   潜水艇
len: 25  is_ascii: True      naval
adj. 海军的
len: 37  is_ascii: True      ministry
n.   （政府的）部
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1970  is_ascii: True     We have all experienced days when everything goes wrong. A day may begin well enough, but suddenly everything seems to get out of control. What invariably happens is that a great number of things choose to go wrong at precisely the same moment. It is as if a single unimportant event set up a chain of reactions. Let us suppose that you are preparing a meal and keeping an eye on the baby at the same time. The telephone rings and this marks the prelude to an unforeseen series of catastrophes. While you are on the phone, the baby pulls the tablecloth off the table, smashing half your best crockery and cutting himself in the process. You hang up hurriedly and attend to baby, crockery, etc. Meanwhile, the meal gets burnt. As if this were not enough to reduce you to tears, your husband arrives, unexpectedly bringing three guests to dinner.
    Things can go wrong on a big scale, as a number of people recently discovered in Parramatta, a suburb of Sydney. During the rush hour one evening two cars collided and both drivers began to argue. The woman immediately behind the two cars happened to be a learner. She suddenly got into a panic and stopped her car. This made the driver following her brake hard. His wife was sitting beside him holding a large cake. As she was thrown forward, the cake went right through the windscreen and landed on the road. Seeing a cake flying through the air, a lorry driver who was drawing up alongside the car, pulled up all of a sudden. The lorry was loaded with empty beer bottles and hundreds of them slid off the back of the vehicle and on to the road. This led to yet another angry argument. Meanwhile, the traffic piled up behind. It took the police nearly an hour to get the traffic on the move again. In the meantime, the lorry driver had to sweep up hundreds of broken bottles. Only two stray dogs benefited from all this confusion, for they greedily devoured what was left of the cake. It was just one of those days!
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 33  is_ascii: True      prelude
n.   序幕，前奏
len: 36  is_ascii: True      unforeseen
adj. 意料之外的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      series
n.   系列
len: 37  is_ascii: True      catastrophe
n.   大祸，灾难
len: 34  is_ascii: True      crockery
n.   陶器，瓦器
len: 23  is_ascii: True      suburb
n.   郊区
len: 24  is_ascii: True      collide
v.   猛撞
len: 27  is_ascii: True      learner
n.   初学者
len: 31  is_ascii: True      panic
n.   惊慌，恐慌
len: 48  is_ascii: True      windscreen
n.   （汽车的）挡风玻璃
len: 56  is_ascii: True      alongside
prep.在……的旁边，与……并排
len: 32  is_ascii: True      slide (slid, slid)
v.   滑
len: 37  is_ascii: True      stray
adj. 迷失的，离群的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      confusion
n.   混乱
len: 28  is_ascii: True      greedily
adv. 贪婪地
len: 35  is_ascii: True      devour
v.   狼吞虎咽地吃
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2004  is_ascii: True     Antique shops exert a peculiar fascination on a great many people. The more expensive kind of antique shop where rare objects are beautifully displayed in glass cases to keep them free from dust is usually a forbidding place. But no one has to muster up courage to enter a less pretentious antique shop. There is always hope that in its labyrinth of musty, dark, disordered rooms a real rarity will be found amongst the piles of assorted junk that little the floors.
    No one discovers a rarity by chance. A truly dedicated bargain hunter must have patience, and above all, the ability to recognize the worth of something when he sees it. To do this, he must be at least as knowledgeable as the dealer. Like a scientist bent on making a discovery, he must cherish the hope that one day he will be amply rewarded.
    My old friend, Frank Halliday, is just such a person. He has often described to me how he picked up a masterpiece for a mere $50. One Saturday morning, Frank visited an antique shop in my neighbourhood. As he had never been there before, he found a great deal to interest him. The morning passed rapidly and Frank was about to leave when he noticed a large packing case lying on the floor. The morning passed rapidly and Frank just come in, but that he could not be bothered to open it. Frank begged him to do so and the dealer reluctantly prised it open. The contents were disappointing. Apart from an interesting-looking carved dagger, the box was full of crockery, much of it broken. Frank gently lifted the crockery out of the box an suddenly noticed a miniature painting at the bottom of the packing case. As its composition and line reminded him of an Italian painting he knew well, he decided to buy it. Glancing at it briefly, the dealer told him that it was worth $50. Frank could hardly conceal his excitement, for he knew that he had made a real discovery. The tiny painting proved to be an unknown masterpiece by Correggio and was worth hundreds of thousands of pounds.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 33  is_ascii: True      antique
n.   古董，古玩
len: 40  is_ascii: True      fascination
n.   魅力，迷惑力
len: 54  is_ascii: True      forbidding
adj. 望而生畏的，望而却步的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      muster
v.   鼓起
len: 49  is_ascii: True      pretentious
adj. 自命不凡的，矫饰的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      labyrinth
n.   迷宫
len: 37  is_ascii: True      musty
adj. 陈腐的，发霉的
len: 29  is_ascii: True      rarity
n.   稀世珍品
len: 34  is_ascii: True      assorted
adj. 各式各样的
len: 34  is_ascii: True      junk 
n.   破烂货，废品
len: 32  is_ascii: True      litter
v.   杂乱地布满
len: 35  is_ascii: True      dedicated
adj. 专心致志的
len: 52  is_ascii: True      bargain hunter
     到处找便宜货买的人
len: 23  is_ascii: True      dealer
v.   商人
len: 33  is_ascii: True      cherish
v.   期望，渴望
len: 25  is_ascii: True      amply
adv. 足够地
len: 28  is_ascii: True      masterpiece
n.   杰作
len: 24  is_ascii: True      mere
adj. 仅仅的
len: 22  is_ascii: True      prise
v.   撬开
len: 22  is_ascii: True      carve
v.   镌刻
len: 32  is_ascii: True      dagger
n.   短剑，匕首
len: 41  is_ascii: True      miniature
adj. 小巧的，小型的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      composition
n.   构图
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1983  is_ascii: True     The word justice is usually associated with courts of law. We might say that justice has been done when a man's innocence or guilt has been proved beyond doubt. Justice is part of the complex machinery of the law. Those who seek it undertake an arduous journey and can never be sure that they will find it. Judges, however wise or eminent, are human and can make mistakes.
    There are rare instances when justice almost ceases to be an abstract concept. Reward or punishment are meted out quite independent of human interference. At such times, justice acts like a living force. When we use a phrase like 'it serves him right', we are, in part, admitting that a certain set of circumstances has enabled justice to act of its own accord.
    When a thief was caught on the premises of large jewellery store on morning, the shop assistants must have found it impossible to resist the temptation to say 'it serves him right.' The shop was an old converted house with many large, disused fireplaces and tall, narrow chimneys. Towards midday, a girl heard a muffed cry coming from behind on of the walls. As the cry was repeated several times, she ran to tell the manager who promptly rang up the fire brigade. The cry had certainly come form one of the chimneys, but as there were so many of them, the fire fighters could not be certain which one it was. They located the right chimney by tapping at the walls and listening for the man's cries. After chipping through a wall which was eighteen inches thick, they found that a man had been trapped in the chimney. As it was extremely narrow, the man was unable to move, but the fire fighters were eventually able to free him by cutting a huge hole in the wall. The sorry-looking, blackened figure that emerged, admitted at once that he had tried to break into the shop during the night but had got stuck in the chimney. He had been there for nearly ten hours. Justice had been done even before the man was handed over to the police.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 42  is_ascii: True      justice
n.   正义，公正；司法
len: 22  is_ascii: True      court
n.   法院
len: 20  is_ascii: True      law
n.   法律
len: 26  is_ascii: True      innocence
n.   无辜
len: 38  is_ascii: True      undertake
v.   承担；着手做
len: 39  is_ascii: True      arduous
adj. 艰苦的，艰难的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      abstract
adj. 抽象的
len: 34  is_ascii: True      concept
n.   概念，观念 
len: 34  is_ascii: True      mete out
     给予，处置
len: 29  is_ascii: True      interference
n.   干涉
len: 23  is_ascii: True      accord
n.   一致
len: 27  is_ascii: True       premises
n.    房屋
len: 33  is_ascii: True      convert
v.   转变，改变
len: 43  is_ascii: True      disused 
adj. 不再用的，废弃的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      fireplace
n.   壁炉
len: 32  is_ascii: True      muffle
v.   捂住，厌抑
len: 31  is_ascii: True      chip 
v.   砍，削，凿
len: 27  is_ascii: True      blacken
v.   使变黑
len: 38  is_ascii: True      emerge
v.   （从某处）出现
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 124  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
What was the chance in a million?
len: 2103  is_ascii: True     We are less credulous than we used to be. In the nineteenth century, a novelist would bring his story to a conclusion by presenting his readers with a series of coincidences -- most of them wildly improbable. Readers happily accepted the fact that an obscure maidservant was really the hero's mother. A long-lost brother, who was presumed dead, was really alive all the time and wickedly plotting to bring about the hero's downfall. And so on. Modern readers would find such naive solution totally unacceptable. Yet, in real life, circumstances do sometimes conspire to bring about coincidences which anyone but a nineteenth century novelist would find incredible.
    When I was a boy, my grandfather told me how a German taxi driver, Franz Bussman, found a brother who was thought to have been killed twenty years before. While on a walking tour with his wife, he stooped to talk to a workman. After they had gone on, Mrs. Bussman commented on the workman's close resemblance to her husband and even suggested that he might be his brother. Franz poured scorn on the idea, pointing out that his brother had been killed in action during the war. Though Mrs. Busssman fully acquainted with this story, she thought that there was a chance in a million that she might be right. A few days later, she sent a boy to the workman to ask him if his name was Hans Bussman. Needless to say, the man's name was Hans Bussman and he really was Franz's long-lost brother. When the brothers were reunited, Hans explained how it was that he was still alive. After having been wounded towards the end of the war, he had been sent to hospital and was separated from his unit. The hospital had been bombed and Hans had made his way back into Western Germany on foot. Meanwhile, his unit was lost and all records of him had been destroyed. Hans returned to his family home, but the house had been bombed and no one in the neighbourhood knew what had become of the inhabitants. Assuming that his family had been killed during an air raid, Hans settled down in a village fifty miles away where he had remained ever since.
len: 76  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
    
     credulous
adj. 轻信的
len: 36  is_ascii: True      improbable
adj. 不大可能的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      obscure
adj. 不起眼的
len: 37  is_ascii: True      maidservant
n.   女仆，女佣
len: 24  is_ascii: True      presume
v.   假定
len: 49  is_ascii: True      wickedly
adv. 心眼坏地，居心叵测地
len: 21  is_ascii: True      plot
v.   密谋
len: 34  is_ascii: True      downfall
n.   倒台，垮台
len: 25  is_ascii: True      naive
adj. 天真的
len: 38  is_ascii: True      unacceptable
adj. 不能接受的
len: 43  is_ascii: True      conspire
v.   （事件）巧合促成
len: 36  is_ascii: True      incredible
adj. 难以置信的
len: 31  is_ascii: True      scorn
n.   嘲弄，挖苦
len: 28  is_ascii: True      acquaint
v.   使了解
len: 27  is_ascii: True      reunite
v.   使团聚
len: 32  is_ascii: True      assume
v.   假定，认为
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1994  is_ascii: True     We have learnt to expect that trains will be punctual. After years of conditioning, most of us have developed an unshakable faith in railway timetables. Ships may be delayed by storms; flights may be cancelled because of bad weather, but trains must be on time. Only an exceptionally heavy snowfall might temporarily dislocate railway services. It is all too easy to blame the railway authorities when something does go wrong. The truth is that when mistakes occur, they are more likely to be ours than theirs.
    After consulting my railway timetable, I noted with satisfaction that there was an express train to Westhaven. It went direct from my local station and the journey lasted mere hour and seventeen minutes. When I boarded the train, I could not help noticing that a great many local people got on as well. At the time, this did not strike me as odd. I reflected that there must be a great many local people besides myself who wished to take advantage of this excellent service. Neither was I surprise when the train stopped at Widley, a tiny station a few miles along the line. Even a mighty express train can be held up by signals. But when the train dawdled at station after station, I began to wonder, It suddenly dawned on me that this express was not roaring down the line at ninety miles an hour, but barely chugging along at thirty. One hour and seventeen minutes passed and we had not even covered half the distance. I asked a passenger if this was the Westhaven Express, but he had not even heard of it. I determined to lodge a complaint as soon as we arrived. Two hours later, I was talking angrily to the station master at Westhaven. When he denied the train's existence, I borrowed his copy of the timetable. There was a note of triumph in my voice when I told him that it was there in black and white. Glancing at it briefly, he told me to look again. A tiny asterisk conducted me to a footnote at the bottom of the page. It said: 'This service has been suspended.'
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 42  is_ascii: True      express
n.   快车；
adj. 高速的
len: 29  is_ascii: True      punctual 
adj. 准时的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      condition 
v.   使习惯于
len: 36  is_ascii: True      unshakable
adj. 不可动摇的
len: 15  is_ascii: True faith
n. 信任
len: 23  is_ascii: True      cancel
v.   取消
len: 33  is_ascii: True      exceptionally
adv. 例外地
len: 41  is_ascii: True      dislocate
v.   打乱（计划等）
len: 22  is_ascii: True      blame
v.   责怪
len: 33  is_ascii: True      consult
v.   请教，查阅
len: 26  is_ascii: True      direct
adv. 径直地
len: 35  is_ascii: True      odd
adj. 奇怪的，异常的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      reflect
v.   细想
len: 26  is_ascii: True      advantage
n.   优势
len: 38  is_ascii: True      mighty
adj. 强大的，有力的
len: 38  is_ascii: True      dawdle
v.   慢吞吞地动或做
len: 33  is_ascii: True      chug
v.   咔嚓咔嚓地响
len: 22  is_ascii: True      lodge
v.   提出
len: 26  is_ascii: True      complaint
n.   抱怨
len: 24  is_ascii: True      triumph
n.   胜利
len: 32  is_ascii: True      asterisk
n.   星号（*）
len: 33  is_ascii: True      conduct
v.   引向，引导
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1934  is_ascii: True     Future historians will be in a unique position when they come to record the history of our own times. They will hardly know which facts to select from the great mass of evidence that steadily accumulates. What is more, they will not have to rely solely on the written word. Films, videos, CDs and CD-ROMS are just some of the bewildering amount of information they will have. They will be able, as it were, to see and hear us in action. But the historian attempting to reconstruct the distant past is always faced with a difficult task. He has to deduce what he can from the few scanty clues available. Even seemingly insignificant remains can shed interesting light on the history of early man.
    Up to now, historians have assumed that calendars came into being with the advent of agriculture, for then man was faced with a real need to understand something about the seasons. Recent scientific evidence seems to indicate that this assumption is incorrect.
    Historians have long been puzzled by dots, lines and symbols which have been engraved on walls, bones, and the ivory tusks of mammoths. The nomads who made these markings lived by hunting and fishing during the last Ice Age which began about 35,000 B.C. and ended about 10,000 B.C. By correlating markings made in various parts of the world, historians have been able to read this difficult code. They have found that it is connected with the passage of days and the phases of the moon. It is, in fact, a primitive type of calendar. It has long been known that the hunting scenes depicted on walls were not simply a form of artistic expression. They had a definite meaning, for they were as near as early man could get to writing. It is possible that there is a definite relation between these paintings and the markings that sometimes accompany them. It seems that man was making a real effort to understand the seasons 20,000 years earlier than has been supposed.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 34  is_ascii: True      calendar
n.   历法，日历
len: 32  is_ascii: True      historian
n.   历史学家
len: 32  is_ascii: True      unique
adj. 无与伦比的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      steadily
adv. 不断地
len: 26  is_ascii: True      solely
adv. 唯一地
len: 22  is_ascii: True      video
n.   录像
len: 45  is_ascii: True      CD-ROOM
n.   （只读）光盘驱动器
len: 37  is_ascii: True      bewilder
v.   令人眼花缭乱
len: 32  is_ascii: True      deduce
v.   推断，推理
len: 38  is_ascii: True      scanty
adj. 不足的，贫乏的
len: 21  is_ascii: True      clue
n.   线索
len: 36  is_ascii: True      insignificant
adj. 不重要的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      shed
v.   使流出，泻
len: 41  is_ascii: True      advent
n.   出现，到来，来临
len: 28  is_ascii: True      agriculture
n.   农业
len: 36  is_ascii: True      assumption
n.   假定，设想
len: 23  is_ascii: True      dot
n.   小圆点
len: 23  is_ascii: True      symbol
n.   符号
len: 24  is_ascii: True      engrave
v.   雕刻
len: 28  is_ascii: True      ivory
n.   象牙制品
len: 36  is_ascii: True      mammoth
n.   （古）长毛象
len: 39  is_ascii: True      tusk
n.   獠牙，长牙，象牙
len: 25  is_ascii: True      nomad
n.   游牧民
len: 35  is_ascii: True      correlate
v.   使相互联系
len: 31  is_ascii: True      phase
n.   月相，天相
len: 29  is_ascii: True      primitive
adj. 原始的
len: 51  is_ascii: True      depict
v.   描画，描绘
     
参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 1918  is_ascii: True     The rough across the plain soon became so bad that we tried to get Bruce to drive back to the village we had come from. Even though the road was littered with boulders and pitted with holes, Bruce was not in the least perturbed. Glancing at his map, he informed us that the next village was a mere twenty miles away. It was not that Bruce always underestimated difficulties. He simply had no sense of danger at all. No matter what the conditions were, he believed that a car should be driven as fast as it could possibly go.
    As we bumped over eh dusty track, we swerved to avoid large boulders. The wheels scooped up stones which hammered ominously under the car. We felt sure that sooner or later a stone would rip a hole in our petrol tank or damage the engine. Because of this, we kept looking back, wondering if we were leaving a trail of oil and petrol behind us.
    What a relief it was when the boulders suddenly disappeared, giving way to a stretch of plain where the only obstacles were clumps of bushes. But there was worse to come. Just ahead of us there was a huge fissure. In response to renewed pleadings, Bruce stopped. Though we all got out to examine the fissure, he remained in the car. We informed him that the fissure extended for fifty years and was tow feet wide and four feet deep. Even this had no effect. Bruce went into a low gear and drove at a terrifying speed, keeping the front wheels astride the crack as he followed its zigzag course. Before we had time to worry about what might happen, we were back on the plain again. Bruce consulted the map once more and told us that the village was now only fifteen miles away. Our next obstacle was a shallow pool of water about half a mile across. Bruce charged at it, but in the middle, the car came to a grinding half. A yellow light on the dashboard flashed angrily and Bruce cheerfully announced that there was no oil in the engine!
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 31  is_ascii: True      rough
adj. 崎岖不平的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      boulder
n.   大石块
len: 32  is_ascii: True      pit
v.   使得坑坑洼洼
len: 27  is_ascii: True      perturb
v.   使不安
len: 30  is_ascii: True      underestimate
v.   低估
len: 26  is_ascii: True      swerve
v.   急转变
len: 22  is_ascii: True      scoop
v.   挖出
len: 44  is_ascii: True      hammer
v.   （用锤）击打，锤打
len: 44  is_ascii: True      ominously
adv. 有预兆的，不祥的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      rip
v.   划破，撕，扯
len: 23  is_ascii: True      petrol
n.   汽油
len: 45  is_ascii: True      stretch
n.   一大片（平地或水）
len: 25  is_ascii: True      obstacle
n.   障碍
len: 25  is_ascii: True      clump
n.   丛，簇
len: 42  is_ascii: True      fissure
n.   （石，地的）深缝
len: 22  is_ascii: True      renew
v.   重复
len: 25  is_ascii: True      pleading
n.   恳求
len: 27  is_ascii: True      gear
n.   汽车排档
len: 27  is_ascii: True      astride
prep.骑，跨
len: 22  is_ascii: True      crack
n.   缝隙
len: 31  is_ascii: True      zigzag
n.  “之”字形
len: 24  is_ascii: True      shallow
adj. 浅的
len: 39  is_ascii: True      grind (ground, ground)
v.   磨擦
len: 68  is_ascii: True      halt
n.   停
 
     dashboard
n.   （汽车上的）仪表盘
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2063  is_ascii: True     It has never been explained why university students seem to enjoy practical jokes more than else. Students specialize in a particular type of practical joke: the hoax. Inviting the fire brigade to put out a nonexistent fire is a crude form of deception which no self-respecting student would ever indulge in. Students often create amusing situations which are funny to everyone except the victims.
    When a student recently saw two workmen using a pneumatic drill outside his university, he immediately telephoned the police and informed them that two students dressed up as workmen were tearing up the road with a pneumatic drill. As soon as he had hung up, he went over to the workmen and told them that if a policeman ordered them to go away, they were not take him seriously. He added that a student had dressed up as a policeman and was playing all sorts of silly jokes on people. Both the police and the workmen were grateful to the student for this piece of advance information.
    The student did in an archway nearby where he could watch and hear everything that went on. Sure enough, a policeman arrived on the scene and politely asked the workmen to go away. When he received a very rude reply from one of the workmen. He threatened to remove them by force. The workmen told him to do as he pleased and the policeman telephoned for help. Shortly afterwards, four more policemen arrived and remonstrated with the workmen. As the men refused to stop working, the police attempted to seize the pneumatic drill. The workmen struggled fiercely and one of them lost his temper. He threatened to call the police. At this, the police pointed out ironically that this would hardly be necessary as the men were already under arrest. Pretending to speak seriously, one of the workmen asked if he might make a telephone call before being taken to the station. Permission was granted and a policeman accompanied him to a pay phone. Only when he saw that the man was actually telephoning the police did he realize that they had all been the victims of a hoax.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 30  is_ascii: True      hoax
n.   骗局，戏弄
len: 35  is_ascii: True      deception
n.   欺骗，骗局
len: 35  is_ascii: True      self-respecting
adj. 自重的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      indulge
v.   使沉迷
len: 29  is_ascii: True      pneumatic
adj. 气动的
len: 19  is_ascii: True      drill
n.   钻
len: 40  is_ascii: True      silly
adj. 无意义的，无聊的
len: 45  is_ascii: True      advance
adj. 预先的，事先获得的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      archway
n.   拱形门楼
len: 37  is_ascii: True      remonstrate
v.   规劝，告诫
len: 30  is_ascii: True      ironically
adv. 讽刺地
len: 27  is_ascii: True      permission
n.   许可
len: 31  is_ascii: True      grant
v.   同意，准予
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 1665  is_ascii: True     谁也弄不清为什么大学生好像比任何人都更喜欢恶作剧。大学生擅长一种特殊的恶作剧——戏弄人。请消防队来扑灭一场根本没有的大火是一种低级骗局，有自尊心的大学生决不会去做。大学生们常常做的是制造一种可笑的局面，使大家笑上一场，当然受害者是笑不出来的。
    最近有个学生看见两个工人在学校门外用风钻干活，马上打电话报告警察，说有两个学生装扮成工人，正在用风钻破坏路面。挂上电话后，他又马上来到工人那儿，告诉他们若有个警察来让他们走开，不要把他当回事，还对工人说，有个学生常装扮成警察无聊地同别人开玩笑。警察与工人都对那个学生事先通报情况表示感谢。
    那个学生躲在附近一拱形的门廊里，在那儿可以看见、听到现场发生的一切。果然，警察来了，不礼貌地请工人离开此地；但其中一个工人粗鲁地回了几句。于是警察威胁要强行使他们离开。工人说，悉听尊便。警察去打电话叫人。一会儿工夫，又来了4个警察，规劝工人离开。由于工人拒绝停下手中的活，警察想夺风钻。两个工人奋力抗争，其中一个发了火，威胁说要去叫警察。警察听后讥讽地说，这大可不必，因为他俩已被逮捕了。其中一个工人装模作样地问道，在被带往警察局之前，是否可以打一个电话。警察同意了，陪他来到一个投币地电话前，当他看到那个工人真的是给警察挂电话，才恍然大悟，原来他们都成一场骗局的受害者。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 165  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
What particular anxiety spoils the country dweller's visit to the theatre?
len: 3020  is_ascii: True     The quiet life of the country ahs never appealed to me. City born and city bred. I have always regarded the country as something you look at through a train window, or something you occasional visit during the weekend. Most of my friends live in the city, yet they always go into raptures at the mere mention of the country. Though they extol the virtues of the peaceful life, only one of hem has ever gone to live in the country and he was back in town within six months. Even he still lives under the illusion that country life is somehow superior to town life. He is forever talking about the friendly people, the clean atmosphere, the closeness to nature and the gentle pace of living. Nothing can be compared, he maintains, with the first cockcrow, the twittering of birds at dawn, the sight of the rising sun glinting on the trees and pastures. This idyllic pastoral scene is only part of the picture. My friend fails to mention the long and friendless winter evenings in front of the TV -- virtually the only form of entertainment. He says nothing about the poor selection of goods in the shops, or about those unfortunate people who have to travel from the country to the city every day to get to work. Why people are prepared to tolerate a four-hour journey each day for the dubious privilege of living in the country is beyond me. They could be saved so much misery and expense if they chose to live in the city where they rightly belong.
    If you can do without the few pastoral pleasures of the country, you will find the city can provide you with the best that life can offer. You never have to travel miles to see your friends. They invariably lie nearby and are always available for an informal chat or an evening's entertainment. Some of my acquaintances in the country come up to town once or twice a year to visit the theatre as a special treat. For them this is a major operation which involves considerable planning. As the play draws to its close, they wonder whether they will ever catch that last train home. The cit dweller never experiences anxieties of this sort. The latest exhibitions, films, or plays are only a short bus ride away. Shopping, too, is always a pleasure. The latest exhibitions, films, or plays are only a short bus ride away. Shopping, too, is always a pleasure. There is so much variety that you never have to make do with second best. Country people run wild when they go shopping in the city and stagger home loaded with as many of the exotic items as they can carry. Nor is the city without its moments of beauty. There is something comforting about the warm glow shed by advertisements on cold wet winter nights. Few things could be more impressive than the peace that descends on deserted city streets at weekends when the thousands that travel to work every day are tucked away in their homes in the country. It has always been a mystery to me who city dwellers, who appreciate all these things, obstinately pretend that they would prefer to live in the country.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 35  is_ascii: True      illusion 
n.   幻想，错觉
len: 28  is_ascii: True      pastoral
adj. 田园的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      breed (bred, bred)
v.   培育
len: 24  is_ascii: True      rapture
n.   欣喜
len: 31  is_ascii: True      extol
v.   赞美，颂扬
len: 28  is_ascii: True      superior
adj. 优越的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      cockcrow
n.   鸡叫
len: 54  is_ascii: True      twitter
v.   （鸟）吱吱叫，嘁嘁喳喳叫
len: 22  is_ascii: True      glint
v.   闪烁
len: 24  is_ascii: True      pasture
n.   牧场
len: 30  is_ascii: True      idyllic
adj. 田园诗的
len: 38  is_ascii: True      virtually
adv. 几乎，差不多
len: 39  is_ascii: True      dubious
adj. 可疑的，怀疑的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      privilege
n.   特权
len: 23  is_ascii: True      misery
n.   苦难
len: 30  is_ascii: True      acquaintance 
n.   熟人
len: 40  is_ascii: True      treat
n.   难得的乐事，享受
len: 27  is_ascii: True      dweller
n.   居住者
len: 33  is_ascii: True      stagger
v.   摇晃，蹒跚
len: 44  is_ascii: True      exotic
adj. 导乎寻常的，外来的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      glow
n.   白炽光
len: 31  is_ascii: True      descend
v. 缩进，隐藏
len: 33  is_ascii: True      descend
v.   缩进，隐藏
len: 43  is_ascii: True      obstinately
adv. 固执地，顽固地
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2567  is_ascii: True     宁静的乡村生活从来没有吸引过我。我生在城市，长在城市，总认为乡村是透过火车车窗看到的那个样了，或偶尔周末去游玩一下景象。我的许多朋友都住在城市，但他们只要一提起乡村，马上就会变得欣喜若狂。尽管他们都交口称赞宁静的乡村生活的种种优点，但其中只有一个人真去农村住过，而且不足6个月就回来了。即使他也仍存有幻觉，好像乡村生活就是比城市生活优越。他滔滔不绝地大谈友好的农民，洁净的空气，贴近大自然的环境和悠闲的生活节奏。他坚持认为，凌晨雄鸡第一声啼叫，黎明时分小鸟吱喳欢叫，冉冉升起的朝阳染红树木、牧场，此番美景无与伦比。但这种田园诗般的乡村风光仅仅是一个侧面。我的朋友没有提到在电视机前度过的漫长寂寞的冬夜——电视是唯一的娱乐形式。他也不说商店货物品种单调，以及那些每天不得不从乡下赶到城里工作的不幸的人们。人们为什么情愿每天在路上奔波4个小时去换取值得怀疑的乡间的优点，我是无法理解的。要是他们愿意住在本来属于他们的城市，则可以让他们省去诸多不便与节约大量开支。
    如果你愿舍弃乡下生活那一点点乐趣的话，那么你会发出城市可以为你提供生活最美好的东西。你去看朋友根本不用跋涉好几英里，因为他们都住在附近，你随时可以同他们聊天或在晚上一起娱乐。我在乡村有一些熟人，他们每年进城来看一回或几回戏，并把此看作一种特殊的享受。看戏在他们是件大事，需要精心计划。当戏快演完时，他们又为是否能赶上末班火车回家而犯愁。这种焦虑，城里人是从未体验过的。坐公共汽车几站路，就可看到最新的展览、电影、戏剧。买东西也是一种乐趣。物品种繁多，从来不必用二等品来凑合。乡里人进城采购欣喜若狂，每次回家时都买足了外来商品，直到拿不动方才罢休，连走路都摇摇晃晃的。城市也并非没有良辰美景。寒冷潮湿的冬夜里，广告灯箱发出的暖光，会给人某种安慰。周末，当成千上万进城上班的人回到他们的乡间寓所之后，空旷的街市笼罩着一种宁静气氛，没有什么能比此时的宁静更令人难忘了。城里人对这一切心里很明白，却偏要执拗地装出他们喜欢住在乡村的样子，这对我来说一直是个谜。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2944  is_ascii: True     Cave exploration, or pot-holing, as it has come to be known, is a relatively new sport. Perhaps it is the desire for solitude or the chance of making an unexpected discovery that lures people down to the depths of the earth. It is impossible to give a satisfactory explanation for a pot-holer's motives. For him, caves have the same peculiar fascination which high mountains have for the climber. They arouse instincts which can only be dimly understood.
    Exploring really deep caves is not a task for the Sunday afternoon rambler. Such undertakings require the precise planning and foresight of military operations. It can take as long as eight days to rig up rope ladders and to establish supply bases before a descent can be made into a very deep cave. Precautions of this sort are necessary, for it is impossible to foretell the exact nature of the difficulties which will confront the pot-holer. The deepest known cave in the world is the Gouffre Berger near Grenoble. It extends to a depth of 3,723 feet. This immense chasm has been formed by an underground stream which has tunneled a course through a flaw in the rocks. The entrance to the cave is on a plateau in the Dauphine Alps. As it is only six feet across, it is barely noticeable. The cave might never have been discovered has not the entrance been spotted by the distinguished French pot-holer, Berger. Since its discovery, it has become a sort of potholers' Everest. Though a number of descents have been made, much of it still remains to be explored.
    A team of pot-holers recently went down the Gouffre Berger. After entering the narrow gap on the plateau, they climbed down the steep sides of the cave until they came to narrow corridor. They had to edge their way along this, sometimes wading across shallow streams, or swimming across deep pools. Suddenly they came to a waterfall which dropped into an underground lake at the bottom of the cave. They plunged into the lake, and after loading their gear on an inflatable rubber dinghy, let the current carry them to the other side. To protect themselves from the icy water, they had to wear special rubber suits. At the far end of the lake, they came to huge piles of rubble which had been washed up by the water. In this part of the cave, they could hear an insistent booming sound which they found was caused by a small waterspout shooting down into a pool from the roof of the cave. Squeezing through a cleft in the rocks, the pot-holers arrived at an enormous cavern, the size of a huge concert hall. After switching on powerful arc lights, they saw great stalagmites -- some of them over forty feet high -- rising up like tree-trunks to meet the stalactites suspended from the roof. Round about, piles of limestone glistened in all the colours of the rainbow. In the eerie silence of the cavern, the only sound that could be heard was made by water which dripped continuously from the high dome above them.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 39  is_ascii: True      caveman
n.   （远古）洞穴人
len: 55  is_ascii: True      pot-holing 
n.   洞穴探险，洞穴探险运动
len: 34  is_ascii: True      solitude
n.   孤独，寂寞
len: 30  is_ascii: True      lure
v.   引诱，诱惑
len: 35  is_ascii: True      pot-holer
n.   洞穴探险者
len: 38  is_ascii: True      undertaking 
n.   任务，工作
len: 41  is_ascii: True      foresight
n.   预见；深谋远虑
len: 25  is_ascii: True      foretell
v.   预言
len: 77  is_ascii: True      Grenoble
n.   格里诺布尔
 
     chasm
n.   断层，裂口，陷坑
len: 24  is_ascii: True      flaw
n.   小裂缝
len: 45  is_ascii: True      distinguished
adj. 杰出的，著名的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      Everest
n.   珠穆朗玛峰
len: 21  is_ascii: True      wade
v.   涉水
len: 26  is_ascii: True      waterfall
n.   瀑布
len: 27  is_ascii: True      gear
n.   一套用具
len: 33  is_ascii: True      inflatable
adj. 可充气的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      rubble
n.   碎瓦
len: 41  is_ascii: True      insistent
adj. 连续的，不断的
len: 21  is_ascii: True      boom
v.   轰响
len: 36  is_ascii: True      waterspout
n.   强大的水柱
len: 28  is_ascii: True      cleft
n.   裂隙，开
len: 26  is_ascii: True      cavern
n.   在洞穴
len: 27  is_ascii: True      stalagmite
n.   石笋
len: 30  is_ascii: True      stalactite
n.   钟乳石
len: 29  is_ascii: True      limestone
n.   石灰石
len: 24  is_ascii: True      glisten
v.   闪烁
len: 43  is_ascii: True      cerie
adj. 引塌恐惧的，可怕的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      dome
n.   穹窿，圆顶
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2761  is_ascii: True Insurance companies are normally willing to insure anything. Insuring public or private property is a standard practice in most countries in the world. If, however, you were holding an open air garden party or a fete it would be equally possible to insure yourself in the event of bad weather. Needless to say, the bigger the risk an insurance company takes, the higher the premium you will have to pay. It is not uncommon to hear that a shipping company has made a claim for cost of salvaging a sunken ship. But the claim made by a local authority to recover the cost of salvaging a sunken pie dish must surely be unique.
    Admittedly it was an unusual pie dish, for it was eighteen feet long and six feet wide. It had been purchased by a local authority so that an enormous pie could be baked for an annual fair. The pie committee decided that the best way to transport the dish would be by canal, so they insured it for the trip. Shortly after it was launched, the pie committee went to a local inn to celebrate. At the same time, a number of teenagers climbed on to the dish and held a little party of their own. Dancing proved to be more than the dish could bear, for during the party it capsized and sank in seven feet of water.
    The pie committee telephoned a local garage owner who arrived in a recovery truck to salvage the pie dish. Shivering in their wet clothes, the teenagers looked on while three men dived repeatedly into the water to locate the dish. They had little difficulty in finding it, but hauling it out of the water proved to be a serious problem. The sides of the dish were so smooth that it was almost impossible to attach hawsers and chains to the rim without damaging it. Eventually chains were fixed to one end of the dish and a powerful winch was put into operation. The dish rose to the surface and was gently drawn towards the canal bank. For one agonizing moment, the dish was perched precariously on the bank of the canal, but it suddenly overbalanced and slid back into the water. The men were now obliged to try once more. This time they fixed heavy metal clamps to both sides of the dish so that they could fasten the chains. The dish now had to be lifted vertically because one edge was resting against the side of the canal. The winch was again put into operation and one of the men started up the truck. Several minutes later, the dish was again put into operation and one of the water. Water streamed in torrents over its sides with such force that it set up a huge wave in the canal. There was danger that the wave would rebound off the other side of the bank and send the dish plunging into the water again. By working at tremendous speed, the men managed to get the dish on to dry land before the wave returned.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 30  is_ascii: True      admittedly
adv. 公认地
len: 22  is_ascii: True      purchase
v.   买
len: 32  is_ascii: True      annual
adj. 一年一度的
len: 46  is_ascii: True      teenager
n.  （13至19岁的）青少年
len: 30  is_ascii: True      capsize
v.   （船）翻
len: 32  is_ascii: True      shiver
v.   打颤，发抖
len: 36  is_ascii: True      dive
v.   （头向下）跳水
len: 21  is_ascii: True      haul
v.   拖曳
len: 26  is_ascii: True      hawser
n.   粗缆绳
len: 47  is_ascii: True      rim
n.   （圆形物品的）外沿，边
len: 22  is_ascii: True      winch
n.   绞车
len: 53  is_ascii: True      agonizing
adj. 精神紧张的，提心吊胆的
len: 34  is_ascii: True      perch
v.   处于（高处）
len: 48  is_ascii: True      precariously 
adv. 危险地，不稳固地
len: 34  is_ascii: True      overbalance
v.   失去平衡
len: 31  is_ascii: True      clamp
n.   夹钳，夹板
len: 30  is_ascii: True      vertically
adv. 垂直地
len: 33  is_ascii: True      torrent
n.   激流，洪流
len: 24  is_ascii: True      rebound
v.   弹回
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2896  is_ascii: True     People travelling long distances frequently have to decide whether they would prefer to go by land, sea, or air. Hardly anyone can positively enjoy sitting in a train for more than a few hours. Train compartments soon get cramped and stuffy. It is almost impossible to take your mind off the journey. Reading is only a partial solution, for the monotonous rhythm of the wheels clicking on the rails soon lulls you to sleep. During the day, sleep comes in snatches. At night, when you really wish to go to sleep, you rarely manage to do so. If you are lucky enough to get a sleeper, you spend half the night staring at the small blue light in the ceiling, or fumbling to find you ticket for inspection. Inevitably you arrive at your destination almost exhausted. Long car journeys are even less pleasant, for it is quite impossible even to read. On motorways you can, at least, travel fairly safely at high speeds, but more often than not, the greater part of the journey is spent on roads with few service stations and too much traffic. By comparison, ferry trips or cruises offer a great variety of civilized comforts. You can stretch your legs on the spacious decks, play games, meet interesting people and enjoy good food -- always assuming, of course, that the sea is calm. If it is not, and you are likely to get seasick, no form of transport could be worse. Even if you travel in ideal weather, sea journeys take a long time. Relatively few people are prepared to sacrifice holiday time for the pleasure of travlling by sea.
    Aeroplanes have the reputation of being dangerous and even hardened travellers are intimidated by them. They also have the disadvantage of being an expensive form of transport. But nothing can match them for speed and comfort. Travelling at a height of 30,000 feet, far above the clouds, and at over 500 miles an hour is an exhilarating experience. You do not have to devise ways of taking your mind off the journey, for an aeroplane gets you to your destination rapidly. For a few hours, you settle back in a deep armchair to enjoy the flight. The real escapist can watch a film and sip champagne on some services. But even when such refinements are not available, there is plenty to keep you occupied. An aeroplane offers you an unusual and breathtaking view of the world. You soar effortlessly over high mountains and deep valleys. You really see the shape of the land. If the landscape is hidden from view, you can enjoy the extraordinary sight of unbroken cloud plains that stretch out for miles before you, while the sun shines brilliantly in a clear sky. The journey is so smooth that there is nothing to prevent you from reading or sleeping. However you decide to spend your time, one thing is certain: you will arrive at your destination fresh and uncrumpled. You will not have to spend the next few days recovering from a long and arduous journey.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 42  is_ascii: True      positively
adv. 绝对地，完全地
len: 67  is_ascii: True      compartment
n.   列车客车厢内的分隔间（或单间）
len: 27  is_ascii: True      cramped
adj. 窄小的
len: 38  is_ascii: True      stuffy
adj. 憋气的，闷气的
len: 43  is_ascii: True      monotonous 
adj. 枯燥的，乏味的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      rhythm
n.   有节奏的运动
len: 31  is_ascii: True      click
v.   发出咔哒声
len: 27  is_ascii: True      lull
v.   催人欲睡
len: 33  is_ascii: True 
     snatch
n.   短时，片段
len: 24  is_ascii: True      sleeper
n.   卧铺
len: 32  is_ascii: True      fumble
v.   乱摸，摸索
len: 27  is_ascii: True      inspection
n.   检查
len: 48  is_ascii: True      inevitably
adv. 必然地，不可避免地
len: 31  is_ascii: True      destination
n.   目的地
len: 33  is_ascii: True      exhaust
v.   使精疲力尽
len: 28  is_ascii: True      motorway
n.   快车道
len: 22  is_ascii: True      ferry
n.   渡船
len: 26  is_ascii: True      cruise
n.   巡游船
len: 28  is_ascii: True      civilize
v.   使文明
len: 28  is_ascii: True      spacious
adj. 宽敞的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      seasick
adj. 晕船的
len: 36  is_ascii: True      intimidate
v.   恐吓，恫吓
len: 38  is_ascii: True      disadvantage
n.   短处，缺点
len: 56  is_ascii: True      exhilarating
adj. 使人高兴的，令人兴奋的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      escapist
n.   逍遥者
len: 24  is_ascii: True      sip
v.   呷，啜 
len: 29  is_ascii: True      champagne
n.   香槟洒
len: 36  is_ascii: True      refinement
n.   精心的安排
len: 53  is_ascii: True      breathtaking 
adj.激动人心的；不寻常的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      soar
v.   高飞，翱翔
len: 36  is_ascii: True      effortlessly 
adv. 不费力地
len: 26  is_ascii: True      landscape
n.   景色
len: 31  is_ascii: True      fresh
adj. 精神饱满的
len: 59  is_ascii: True      uncrumpled
adj. 没有垮下来
         
参考译文
len: 2509  is_ascii: True 出远门的人常常需要决定是走旱路、水路，还是坐飞机。很少有人能够真正喜欢坐几个小时以上的火车。车厢很快就变得拥挤、闷热，想摆脱开旅途的困扰是很难的。看书只能解决部分问题。车轮与铁轨间单调的嘎喳声很快就会送你进入梦乡。白天是忽睡忽醒，到了夜晚，你真想睡了，却很难入睡。即使你走运弄到一个卧铺，夜间有一半时间你会盯着车顶那盏小蓝灯而睡不着觉；要不然就为查票摸索你的车票。一旦抵达目的地，你总是疲惫不堪。乘汽车作长途旅行则更加不舒服，因为连看书都几乎不可能。在公路上还好，你至少能以相当快的速度安全地向前行。但旅行的大部分时间都花在路上，而且只有很少的服务设施，交通也很拥挤。相比之下，坐船旅行或环游可以得到文明世界的各种享受。你可以在甲板上伸展四肢、做游戏，还能也很见到各种有趣的人，能享用各种美味佳肴——当然，这一切只有在大海风平浪静的情况下才有可能。如果大海肆虐起来，你就可能晕船，那种难受劲儿是任何一种别的旅行的方式都不会带来的。即使风平浪静，坐船旅行也要占用很长时间。没有多少人会为享受坐船旅行的乐趣而牺牲假期的时间。
飞机以危险而著称，连老资格的旅行者也怕飞机。飞机另一个缺点是昂贵。但就速度与舒适而言，飞机是无与伦比的。腾云驾雾，在30，000 英尺高空以500英里的时速旅行，这种经历令人心旷神怡。你不必想办法去摆脱旅途的困扰，因为飞机会迅速地把你送到目的地。几小时之内，你躺在扶手椅上，享受着旅途的欢乐。真正会享受的人还可以在某些航班上看一场电影和喝香槟。即使没有这些消遣条件，也总是有事可做。飞机上，你可以观察世界上非同寻常的奇妙的美景。你毫不费劲地飞越高山幽谷，你确能饱览大地的风貌。如果这种景色被遮住了，你可以观赏一下展现在你面前的、一望数英里的、连绵不断的云海，同时阳光灿烂，天空清澈明朗。旅途平稳，丝毫不妨碍你阅读或睡眠。不管你打算如何消磨时间，有件事是可以肯定的，即当你抵达目的地时，你感到精神焕发，毫无倦意，用不着因为漫长的旅途的辛苦而花几天时间休息来恢复精神。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2310  is_ascii: True     In democratic countries any efforts to restrict the freedom of the press are rightly condemned. However, this freedom can easily be abused. Stories about people often attract far more public attention than political events. Though we may enjoy reading about the lives of others, it is extremely doubtful whether we would equally enjoy reading about ourselves. Acting on the contention that facts are sacred, reporters can cause untold suffering to individuals by publishing details about their private lives. Newspapers exert such tremendous influence that they can not only bring about major changes to the lives of ordinary people but can even overthrow a government.
    The story of a poor family that acquired fame and fortune overnight, dramatically illustrates the power of the press. The family lived in Aberdeen, a small town of 23,000 inhabitants in South Dakota. As the parents had five children, life was a perpetual struggle against poverty. They were expecting their sixth child and were faced with even more pressing economic problems. If they had only had one more child, the fact would have passed unnoticed. They would have continued to struggle against economic odds and would have lived in obscurity. But they suddenly became the parents of quintuplets, an aeroplane arrived in Aberdeen bringing sixty reporters and photographers.
    The rise to fame was swift. Television cameras and newspapers carried the news to everyone in the country. Newspapers and magazines offered the family huge sums for the exclusive rights to publish stories and photographs. Gifts poured in not only from unknown people, but room baby food and soap manufacturers who wished to advertise their products. The old farmhouse the family lived in was to be replaced by new $500,000 home. Reporters kept pressing for interviews so lawyers had to be employed to act as spokesmen for the family at press conferences. While the five babies were babies were still quietly sleeping in oxygen tents in hospital nursery, their parents were paying the price for fame. It would never again be possible for them to lead normal lives. They had become the victims of commercialization, for their names had acquired a market value. Instead of being five new family members, these children had immediately become a commodity.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 30  is_ascii: True      democratic
adj. 民主的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      restrict
v.   限制
len: 22  is_ascii: True      abuse
v.   滥用
len: 27  is_ascii: True      contention
n.   论点
len: 26  is_ascii: True      untold
adj. 数不尽
len: 50  is_ascii: True      South Dakota
     南达科他州（美国）
len: 29  is_ascii: True      perpetual
adj. 永久的
len: 36  is_ascii: True      quintuplet
n.   五胞胎之一
len: 32  is_ascii: True      obscurity
n.   默默无闻
len: 41  is_ascii: True      radically
adv. 彻底地，完全地
len: 41  is_ascii: True      exclusive
adj. 独占的，独家的
len: 39  is_ascii: True      nursery
n.   育婴室，保育室
len: 37  is_ascii: True      commercialization
n.   商品化
len: 26  is_ascii: True      commodity
n.   商品
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 3009  is_ascii: True     So great is our passion for doing things for ourselves, that we are becoming increasingly less dependent on specialized labour. No one can plead ignorance of a subject any longer, for these are countless do-it-yourself publications. Armed with the right tools and materials, newlyweds gaily embark on the task of decorating their own homes. Men, particularly, spend hours of their leisure time installing their own fireplaces, laying out their own gardens; building garages and making furniture. Some really keen enthusiasts go so far as to build their own computers. Shops cater for the do-it-yourself craze not only by running special advisory services for novices, but by offering consumers bits and pieces which they can assemble at home. Such things provide an excellent outlet for pent up creative energy, but unfortunately not all of us are born handymen.
    Some wives tend to believe that their husbands are infinitely resourceful and can fix anything. Even men who can hardly drive a nail in straight are supposed to be born electricians, carpenters, plumbers and mechanics. When lights fuse, furniture gets rickety, pipes get clogged, or vacuum cleaners fail to operate, some woman assume that their husbands will somehow put things right. The worst thing about the do-it-yourself game is that sometimes even men live under the delusion that they can do anything, even when they have repeatedly been proved wrong. It is a question of pride as much as anything else.
    Last spring my wife suggested that I call in a man to look at our lawn mower. It had broken down the previous summer, and though I promised to repair it, I had never got round to it. I would not hear of the suggestion and said that I would fix it myself. One Saturday afternoon, I hauled the machine into the garden and had a close look at it. As far as I could see, it needed only a minor adjustment: a turn of a screw here, a little tightening up there, a drop of oil and it would be as good as new. Inevitably the repair job was not quite so simple. The mower firmly refused to mow, so I decided to dismantle it. The garden was soon littered with chunks of metal which had once made up a lawn mower. But I was extremely pleased with myself. I had traced the cause of the trouble. One of links in the chain that drives the wheels had snapped. After buying a new chain I was faced with the insurmountable task of putting the confusing jigsaw puzzle together again. I was not surprised to find that the machine still refused to work after I had reassembled it, for the simple reason that I was left with several curiously shaped bits of metal which did not seem to fit anywhere. I gave up in despair. The weeks passed and the grass grew. When my wife nagged me to do something about it, I told her that either I would have to buy a new mower or let the grass grow. Needless to say our house is now surrounded by a jungle. Buried somewhere in deep grass there is a rusting lawn mower which I have promised to repair one day.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 40  is_ascii: True      plead
v.   找（借口），辩解
len: 35  is_ascii: True      ignorance
n.   无知，不懂
len: 31  is_ascii: True      publication
n.   出版物
len: 32  is_ascii: True      newlyweds
n.   新婚夫妇
len: 37  is_ascii: True      gaily
adv. 愉快地，高兴地
len: 24  is_ascii: True      leisure
n.   空闲
len: 36  is_ascii: True      keen
adj. 热心的，渴望的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      advisory
adj. 咨询的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      novice
n.   新手
len: 37  is_ascii: True      consumer
n.   消费者，顾客
len: 34  is_ascii: True      assemble
v.   装配，组装
len: 23  is_ascii: True      outlet
n.   出路
len: 31  is_ascii: True      creative
adj. 创造性的
len: 46  is_ascii: True      handyman
n.   手巧的人，能工巧匠
len: 37  is_ascii: True      resourceful
adj. 足智多谋的
len: 45  is_ascii: True      fuse
v.   由于烧断保险丝而短路
len: 42  is_ascii: True      rickety
adj. 要散架的，晃动的
len: 21  is_ascii: True      clog
v.   堵塞
len: 25  is_ascii: True      delusion
n.   错觉
len: 31  is_ascii: True      lawn mower
      割草机
len: 27  is_ascii: True      adjustment
n.   调整
len: 25  is_ascii: True      screw
n.   螺丝钉
len: 26  is_ascii: True      dismantle
v.   拆卸
len: 28  is_ascii: True      chunk
n.   （厚）块
len: 21  is_ascii: True      snap
v.   绷断
len: 58  is_ascii: True      insurmountable
adj. 不能克服的，难以对付的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      jigsaw
n.   线锯
len: 26  is_ascii: True      nag
v.   唠叨不休
len: 22  is_ascii: True      rust
v.   生锈 
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2555  is_ascii: True     现在我们自己动手做事的热情很高，结果对于专业工人的依赖越来越少了。由于出版了不计其数的教人自己动手做事的书报杂志，没有人再能说对某事一无所知。新婚夫妇找来合适的工具和材料，喜气洋洋地开始布置新房。特别是男人，常利用空闲时间安装壁炉、布置花园、建造车库、制作家具。有些热衷于自己动手的人甚至自己组装电脑。为了满足自己动手热的需要，商店不仅为初学者提供专门的咨询服务，而且为顾客准备了各种零件，供他们买回家去安装。这些东西为人们潜在的创造力提供了一个绝妙的用武之地。但不幸的是，我们并非人人都是能工巧匠。
    妻子常常认为她们的丈夫无比聪明能干。甚至那些连一枚钉子都钉不直的男人都被认为是天生的电工、木匠、水管工和机械师。每当电灯保险丝烧断、家具榫头松动、管道堵塞、吸尘器不动时，有些妻子认为丈夫总有办法。自己动手的例子中最糟糕的是，有时甚至是男人尽管接连失败却还误以为自己什么都行，原因就是要面子。
    今年春天，妻子让我请人检查一下我家的割草机。那台割草机去年夏天就坏了，尽管我答应修，但一直没抽出时间，我不愿听妻子的建议，说我自己会修。一个星期六的下午，我把割草机拉到了花园里，仔细检查了一番。在我看来，只需稍加调整即可。这儿紧紧螺丝，那儿固定一下，再加几滴油，就会像新的一样了。事实上，修理工作远不是那么简单。修完后割草机还是纹丝不动。于是，我决定把它拆开。一会儿工夫，割草机便被拆成一个个金属零件，乱七八糟地堆在花园里。但我却非常高兴，因为我找到了毛病所在。驱动轮子的链条断了一节。我买来一根新链条后，面临的就是如何把这些令人眼花缭乱的拼板重新组装起来。等我装完后，那台割草机仍然一动不动，对此我倒并不感到吃惊。原因很简单，因为还剩下几个形状奇特的零件似乎哪里也装不上去。我无可奈何，只好罢休。几个星期过去了，草长了起来。妻子喋喋不休让我想点办法。我告诉她，要么买一台新割草机，要么让草长下去。不用说，我家现在已被丛林包围。深草丛中的某个地方有一台正在生锈的割草机，那就是我曾答应某日要修理的割草机。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 167  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
What does the writer describe as an 'amusing old-fashioned source of noise'?
len: 2918  is_ascii: True     Pollution is the price we pay for an overpopulated, over industrialized planet. When you come to think about it, there are only four ways you can deal with rubbish: dump it, burn it, turn it into something you can use again, attempt to produce less of it. We keep trying all four methods, but he sheer volume of rubbish we produce worldwide threatens to overwhelm us.
    Rubbish, however, is only part of the problem of polluting our planet. The need to produce ever-increasing quantities of cheap food leads to a different kind of pollution. Industrialized farming methods produce cheap meat products: beef, pork and chicken. The use of pesticides and fertilizers produces cheap grain and vegetables. The price we pay for cheap food may be already too high: Mad Cow Disease (BSE) in cattle, salmonella in chicken and eggs, and wisteria in dairy products. And if you think you'll abandon meat and become a vegetarian, you have the choice of very expensive organically-grown vegetables or a steady diet of pesticides every time you think you're eating fresh salads and vegetables, or just having an innocent glass of water!
    However, there is an even more insidious kind of pollution that particularly affects urban areas and invades our daily lives, and that is noise. Burglar alarms going off at any time of the day or night serve only to annoy passers-by and actually assist burglars to burgle. Car alarms constantly scream at us in the street and are a source of profound irritation. A recent survey of the effects of noise revealed (surprisingly?) that dogs barking incessantly in the night rated the highest form of noise pollution on a scale ranging from 1 to 7. The survey revealed a large number of sources of noise that we really dislike. Lawn mowers whining on a summer's day, late-night parties in apartment blocks, noisy neighbors, vehicles of al kinds, especially large container trucks thundering through quiet village, planes and helicopters flying overhead, large radios carried round in public places and played at maximum volume. New technology has also made its own contribution to noise. A lot of people object to mobile phones, especially when they are used in public places like restaurants or on public transport. Loud conversations on mobile phones invade our thoughts or interrupt the pleasure of meeting friends for a quiet chat. The noise pollution survey revealed a rather spurring and possibly amusing old fashioned source of noise. It turned out to be snoring! Men were found to be the worst offenders. It was revealed that 20% of men in their mid-thirties snore. This figure rises to a staggering 60% of men in their sixties. Against these figures, it was found that only 5% of women snore regularly, while the rest are constantly woken or kept awake by their trumpeting partners. Whatever the source of noise, one thing is certain: silence, it seems, has become a golden memory.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 26  is_ascii: True      pollution
n.   污染
len: 36  is_ascii: True      overpopulated
adj. 人口多的
len: 48  is_ascii: True      over-industrialized
adj. 过度工业化的
len: 41  is_ascii: True      sheer 
adj. 纯粹的，不掺杂的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      worldwide
adv. 在全世界
len: 44  is_ascii: True      overwhelm
v.   制服，使不知所措
len: 24  is_ascii: True      pollute
v.   污染
len: 29  is_ascii: True      pesticide
n.   杀虫剂
len: 27  is_ascii: True      fertilizer
n.   肥料
len: 33  is_ascii: True      salmonella
n.   沙门氏菌
len: 34  is_ascii: True      listeria
n.   利斯特杆菌
len: 33  is_ascii: True      vegetarian
n.   吃素的人
len: 88  is_ascii: True      organically-grown
adj. 有机培植的（不施化肥和其他化学药品培植）
len: 35  is_ascii: True      insidious
adj. 暗中为害的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      urban
adj. 城市的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      burglar
n.   窃贼
len: 29  is_ascii: True      burgle
v.   入室偷窃
len: 23  is_ascii: True      scream
v.   尖叫
len: 28  is_ascii: True      profound
adj. 极度的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      irritation
n.   烦躁
len: 37  is_ascii: True      incessantly
adv. 连续不断地
len: 28  is_ascii: True      whine
v.   发呜呜声
len: 33  is_ascii: True      helicopter
n.   直升飞机
len: 27  is_ascii: True      maximum
adj. 最大的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      technology
n.   技术
len: 29  is_ascii: True      contribution
n.   贡献
len: 29  is_ascii: True      mobile
adj. 可移动的
len: 53  is_ascii: True      snore
v.   打鼾
 
     offender
v.   冒犯者
len: 36  is_ascii: True      staggering
adj. 令人惊愕的
len: 24  is_ascii: True      trumpet
v.   吹号
len: 24  is_ascii: True      partner
n.   伙伴
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2830  is_ascii: True     污染就是我们为这个人口过密，过度工业化的星球所付出的代价。当我们开始考虑垃圾问题时，我们只有4种对付垃圾的方法：倾倒、焚烧、把垃圾变成再生材料或试图少产生一些垃圾。我们一直在试这4种方式，但是，我们在世界范围内仅产生的垃圾的量就有把我们覆盖的危险。
    然而，垃圾只是我们这个星球的污染问题的一个方面。日益增长的对廉价食物的需求导致了另一种形式的污染。工业化的农作方式生产出廉价的肉类制品——牛肉、猪肉和鸡肉。使用杀虫剂和化肥生产出廉价的谷物和蔬菜。为了廉价食物我们付出代价已经太高了：牛肉中的疯牛病，鸡肉和鸡蛋中的沙门氏菌，奶制品中的利斯特杆菌。如果你想放弃肉类而变成一位素食者，那么你可以两者择一：或是选用价格昂贵、有机培植的蔬菜，或是当你认为在享用新鲜色拉和新鲜蔬菜或饮用一杯无害的水的时候，实际上每次都不断吃进杀虫剂。
    但是，还有一种更加隐蔽有害的污染，它专门影响城镇地区，侵袭我们的日常生活，那就是噪音。防盗警报器在白天和黑夜的任何时候都会响起来，它的作用只是骚扰过路行人，而实际上却帮助窃贼入室行窃。在街上，汽车的防盗警报不断对我们吼叫，这是人们极度烦燥的一个原因，最近一个有关噪音的作用的调查（令人吃惊地）指出，夜间连续不断的狗叫声，在一个从1级至7级刻度表上应列为最严重的噪间污染。这个调查揭示了我们所不喜欢的大量的噪间的来源：夏天呜呜作响的割草机，公寓楼里深夜聚会的喧哗声，大声吵闹的邻居，各式各样的车辆，特别是穿越寂静的村庄的集装箱卡车，从头顶飞过的飞机和直升机，被带到公共场所、音量开到最大的大功率收音机。新技术也为噪音作了它的贡献。许多人都反对移动式电话，特别是在如饭店，公共交通车等公共场所使用移动电话。用移动电话大声交谈干扰我们的思路，破坏我们和朋友在一起轻声聊天所得到的乐趣。这个有关噪音的污染调查还揭示了一种出人意外而同时可能会引人意外而同时可能会引人发笑的老式噪音源。它竟然是鼾声。人类是这方面的罪魁祸首。调查指出，20%的35岁左右的男人打鼾；而到60岁这个年龄段，这个数字上升到令人惊愕的60%。与这些数字相比，只有5% 的女性经常打鼾；而其余则经常被与她们同睡、像吹号似地打着呼噜的男人吵醒或弄得睡不着。不管噪声来自何方，有一点是肯定的：看来寂静已变成一种珍贵的回忆。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2959  is_ascii: True     In this much-travelled world, there are still thousands of places which are inaccessible to tourists. We always assume that villagers in remote places are friendly and hospitable. But people who are cut off not only from foreign tourists, but even from their own countrymen can be hostile to travellers. Visits to really remote villages are seldom enjoyable -- as my wife and I discovered during a tour through the Balkans.
    We had spent several days in a small town and visited a number of old churches in the vicinity. These attracted many visitors, for they were not only of great architectural interest, but contained a large number of beautifully preserved frescoes as well. On the day before our departure, several bus loads of tourists descended on the town. This was more than we could bear, so we decided to spend our last day exploring the countryside. Taking a path which led out of the town, we crossed a few fields until we came to a dense wood. We expected the path to end abruptly, but we found that it traced its way through the trees. We tramped through the wood for over two hours until we arrived at a deep stream. We could see that the path continued on the other side, but we had no idea how we could get across the stream. Suddenly my wife spotted a boat moored to the bank. In it there was a boatman fast asleep. We gently woke him up and asked him to ferry us to the other side. Though he was reluctant to do so at first, we eventually persuaded him to take us.
    The path led to a tiny village perched on the steep sides of a mountain. The place consisted of a straggling unmade road which was lined on either side by small houses. Even under a clear blue sky, the village looked forbidding, as all the houses were built of grey mud bricks. The village seemed deserted, the only sign of life being an ugly-looking black goat on a short length of rope tied to a tree in a field nearby. Sitting down on a dilapidated wooden fence near the field, we opened a couple of tins of sardines and had a picnic lunch. All at once, I noticed that my wife seemed to be filled with alarm. Looking up I saw that we were surrounded by children in rags who were looking at us silently as we ate. We offered them food and spoke to them kindly, but they remained motionless. I concluded that they were simply shy of strangers. When we later walked down the main street of the villager, we were followed by a silent procession of children. The village which had seemed deserted, immediately came to life. Faces appeared at windows. Men in shirt sleeves stood outside their houses and glared at us. Old women in black shawls peered at us from doorways. The most frightening thing of all was that not a sound could be heard. There was no doubt that we were unwelcome visitors. We needed no further warning. Turning back down the main street, we quickened our pace and made our way rapidly towards the stream where we hoped the boatman was waiting.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 48  is_ascii: True      inaccessible
adj. 难接近的,达不到的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      hospitable
adj. 不好客的
len: 43  is_ascii: True      hostile
adj. 不友好的,有敌意的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      vicinity
n.   周围,近邻
len: 33  is_ascii: True      architectural
adj. 建筑的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      fresco
n.   壁画
len: 38  is_ascii: True      abruptly
adv. 突然地,意外地
len: 28  is_ascii: True      tramp
v.   徒步行进
len: 51  is_ascii: True      moor
v.   （用绳、链、锚）系（船）
len: 34  is_ascii: True      ferry
v.   （用渡船）运
len: 40  is_ascii: True      straggle
v.   蔓延，散乱分布
len: 45  is_ascii: True      sardine
n.   沙丁鱼，沙丁鱼罐头
len: 26  is_ascii: True      rag
n.   破烂衣服
len: 30  is_ascii: True      procession
adj. 不动的
len: 31  is_ascii: True      shawl
n.   披巾，围巾
len: 30  is_ascii: True      peer
v.   凝视，盯着
len: 24  is_ascii: True      quicken
v.   加快
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 3143  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
    It is a good thing my aunt Harriet died years ago. If she were alive today she would not be able to air her views on her favourite topic of conversation: domestic servants. Aunt Harriet lived in that leisurely age when servants were employed to do housework. She had a huge, rambling country house called 'The Gables'. She was sentimentally attached to this house, for even though it was far too big for her needs, she persisted in living there long after her husband's death. Before she grew old, Aunt Harriet used to entertain lavishly. I often visited The Gables when I was boy. No matter how many guests were present, the great house was always immaculate. The parquet floors shone like mirrors; highly polished silver was displayed in gleaming glass cabinets; even my uncle's huge collection of books was kept miraculously free from dust. Aunt Harriet presided over an invisible army of servants that continuously scrubbed, cleaned, and polished. She always referred to them as 'the shifting population', for they came and went with such frequency that I never even got a chance to learn their names. Though my aunt pursued what was, in those days, an enlightened policy, in that she never allowed her domestic staff to work more than eight hours a day, she was extremely difficult to please. While she always criticized the fickleness of human nature, she carried on an unrelenting search for the ideal servant to the end of her days, even after she had been sadly disillusioned by Bessie.
    Bessie worked for Aunt Harriet for three years. During that time she so gained my aunt's confidence that she was put in charge of the domestic staff. Aunt Harriet could not find words to praise Bessie's industriousness and efficiency. In addition to all her other qualifications, Bessie was an expert cook. She acted the role of the perfect servant for three years before Aunt Harriet discovered her 'little weakness'. After being absent from the Gables for a week, my aunt unexpectedly returned one afternoon with a party of guests and instructed Bessie to prepare dinner. No only was the meal well below the usual standard, but Bessie seemed unable to walk steadily. She bumped into the furniture and kept mumbling about the guests. When she came in with the last course -- a huge pudding -- she tripped on the carpet and the pudding went flying through the air, narrowly missed my aunt, and crashed on the dining table with considerable force. Though this caused great mirth among the guests, Aunt Harriet was horrified. She reluctantly came to the conclusion that Bessie was drunk. The guests had, of course, realized this from the moment Bessie opened the door for them and, long before the final catastrophe, had had a difficult time trying to conceal their amusement. The poor girl was dismissed instantly. After her departure, Aunt Harriet discovered that there were piles of empty wine bottles of all shapes and sizes neatly stacked in what had once been Bessie's wardrobe. They had mysteriously found their way there from the wine cellar!
len: 42  is_ascii: True 
New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 34  is_ascii: True      rambling
adj. 杂乱无章的
len: 45  is_ascii: True      sentimentally
adv. 感情上，多情地
len: 45  is_ascii: True      immaculate
adj. 清洁的，无污点的
len: 40  is_ascii: True      lavishly
adv. 慷慨地，大方地
len: 30  is_ascii: True      parquet
n.   镶木地板
len: 31  is_ascii: True      gleam
v.   发亮，闪光
len: 24  is_ascii: True      preside
v.   指挥
len: 44  is_ascii: True      invisible
adj. 看不见的，无形的
len: 31  is_ascii: True      scrub
v.   擦拭，刷洗
len: 31  is_ascii: True      enlightened
adj. 开明的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      fickleness
n.   变化无常
len: 58  is_ascii: True      unrelenting
adj. 不屈不挠的，不松懈的确良
len: 40  is_ascii: True      disillusion
v.   使幻想破灭的
len: 40  is_ascii: True      qualification
n.    资格，能力
len: 31  is_ascii: True      mirth
n.   欢笑，高兴
len: 31  is_ascii: True      stack
v.   整齐地堆放
len: 24  is_ascii: True      cellar
n.   地窖 
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2655  is_ascii: True     我的姑妈哈丽特好多年前就去世了，这倒是件好事。如果她活到今天，她将不能就她热衷的话题“佣人”发表意见了。哈丽特生活在一个悠闲的年代，家务事都由雇来的佣人代劳。她在乡下有一幢巨大杂乱的房子，叫作“山墙庄园”。她对这幢房子在感情上难舍难分。房子实在太大了，但在丈夫去世多年后，她仍然执意长年住在那儿。哈丽特姑妈年轻时，喜欢大摆宴席，招待宾客。我小时候常去“山墙庄园”作客。不管去多少宾客，大房子里总是收拾得干干净净。镶木地板洁如明镜，擦得发亮的银器陈列在明亮的玻璃柜里，连姑夫的大量藏书也保存得很好，奇迹般地一尘不染。哈丽特姑妈统率着一支看不见的佣人大军，他们不停地擦拭、清扫、刷洗。她称这些佣人叫“流动人口”，因为他们来匆匆，所以我甚至都没有机会知道他们的姓名。姑妈待佣人在当时算是开明的，从来不让佣人每天工作超过8小时，但他们很难使她称心如意。她一方面总是批评人的本性朝三暮四，另一方面她又持之以恒地寻找一个理想的佣人。即使在贝西大大地伤她的心之后，她还在找，一直到她死去。
    贝西在哈丽特家干了3年。在此期间，她赢得了姑母的赏识，甚至当上了大管家。哈丽特不知该用什么言辞来赞扬贝西的勤奋与高效。贝西除了有各种本领以外，还是一个烹饪大师。她担任“理想仆人”角色3年之后，哈丽特终于发现她有“小小的弱点”。一次，姑妈有一个星期没在“山墙庄园”住。一天下午，她出其不意地回来了，带来一大批客人，吩咐贝西准备晚饭。结果，不仅饭菜远不如平时做得好，而且贝西走起路来似乎东倒西歪。她撞到了家具上，嘴里还不断咕咕哝哝议论客人。当她端着最后一道菜——一大盘布丁——走进屋来时，在地毯上绊了一跤。布丁飞到半空，从姑母身边擦过，然后狠狠地砸在餐桌上。这件事引起了客人们的欢笑，但哈丽特却着实吓了一跳。她不得不认定贝西是喝醉了。客人们自然从贝西为他们开门那一刻起就看出来了，在好长一段时间里，即最后这个乱子发生前，他们努力克制才没笑出声来。贝西当即被解雇了。贝西走后，哈丽特姑妈发现在贝西以前用过的衣柜里整整齐齐地放着一堆堆形状各导、大小不一的酒瓶子。这些酒瓶神不知鬼不觉地从酒窖来到了这里。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 148  is_ascii: True Listen to the tape then answer the question below.
听录音，然后回答以下问题。
What marked the end of the writer's New Year resolutions?
len: 2938  is_ascii: True     The New Year is a time for resolutions. Mentally, at least, most of us could compile formidable lists of 'dos' and 'don'ts'. The same old favorites recur year in year out with monotonous regularity. We resolve to get up earlier each morning, eat less, find more time to play with the children, do a thousand and one jobs about the house, be nice to people we don't' like, drive carefully, and take the dog for a walk every day. Past experience has taught us that certain accomplishments are beyond attainment. If we remain inveterate smokers, it is only because we have so often experienced the frustration that results from failure. Most of us fail in our efforts at self-improvement because our schemes are too ambitious and we never have time to carry them out. We also make the fundamental error of announcing our resolutions to everybody so that we look even more foolish when we slip back into our bad old ways. Aware of these pitfalls, this year I attempted to keep my resolutions to myself. I limited myself to two modest ambitions: to do physical exercise every morning and to read more of an evening. An all-night party on New Year's Eve provided me with a good excuse for not carrying out either of these new resolutions on the first day of the year, but on the second, I applied myself assiduously to the task.
    The daily exercises lasted only eleven minutes and I proposed to do them early in the morning before anyone had got up. The self-discipline required to drag myself out of bed eleven minutes earlier than usual was considerable. Nevertheless, I managed to creep down into the living room for two days before anyone found me out. After jumping about on the carpet and twisting the human frame into uncomfortable positions, I sat down at the breakfast table in an exhausted condition. It was this that betrayed me. The next morning the whole family trooped in to watch the performance. That was really unsettling, but I fended off the taunts and jibes of the family good-humouredly and soon everybody got used to the idea. However, my enthusiasm waned. The time I spent at exercises gradually diminished. Little by little the eleven minutes fell to zero. By January 10th, I was back to where I had started from. I argued that if I spent less time exhausting myself at exercises in the morning, I would keep my mind fresh for reading when I got home formwork Resisting the hypnotizing effect of television, I sat in my room for a few evenings with my eyes glued to book. One night, however, feeling cold and lonely, I went downstairs and sat in front of the television pretending to read. That proved to be my undoing, for I soon got back to my old bad habit of dozing off in front of the screen. I still haven't given up my resolution to do more reading. In fact, I have just bought a book entitled How to Read a Thousand Words a Minute. Perhaps it will solve my problem, but I just haven't had time to read it!
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 28  is_ascii: True      resolution
n.   决心 
len: 28  is_ascii: True      mentally
adv. 内心里
len: 33  is_ascii: True      compile
v.   编辑，编制
len: 36  is_ascii: True      formidable
adj. 令人畏惧的
len: 37  is_ascii: True      recur
v.   再发生，又出现
len: 30  is_ascii: True      regularity
n.   规律性
len: 31  is_ascii: True      accomplishment
n.   成就
len: 27  is_ascii: True      attainment
n.   达到
len: 36  is_ascii: True      inveterate
adj. 根深蒂固的
len: 39  is_ascii: True      self-improvement
n.   自我完善
len: 41  is_ascii: True      scheme
n.   简单的计划，方案
len: 35  is_ascii: True      ambitious
adj. 雄心勃勃的
len: 51  is_ascii: True      pitfall
n.   意外的困难，易犯的错误
len: 35  is_ascii: True      modest
adj. 要求不过分的
len: 31  is_ascii: True      assiduously
adv. 刻苦地
len: 38  is_ascii: True      self-discipline
n.   自我约束
len: 22  is_ascii: True      frame
n.   躯体
len: 32  is_ascii: True      betray
v.   暴露，显露
len: 37  is_ascii: True      troop
v.   成群结队地走动
len: 28  is_ascii: True      unsettle
v.   使不安
len: 40  is_ascii: True      taunt
n.   嘲笑，奚落人的话
len: 30  is_ascii: True      jibe
n.   嘲弄，挖苦
len: 50  is_ascii: True      good-humouredly
adv. 和气地，心情好地
len: 36  is_ascii: True      wane
v.   逐渐变小，变弱
len: 41  is_ascii: True      hypnotize
v.   使欲睡，使蒙胧
len: 42  is_ascii: True      undoing
n.   祸根，毁灭的原因
len: 32  is_ascii: True      screen
n.   电视机屏幕
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2622  is_ascii: True     新年是下决心的时候，至少在大多数人的心里会编排出一份“应做什么”和“不应做什么”的令人生畏的单子。相同的决心以单调的规律年复一年地出现。我们决心每天早晨起得早些；吃得少些；多花点时间与孩子们一起做游戏；做大量的家务；对不喜欢的人友善一些；小心驾车；每天都要带着狗散步；等等。以往的经验告诉我们有些事是办不到的。如果我们烟瘾大，戒不掉，那是因为屡戒屡败，失去信心。我们大多数人想自我完善却遭到失败，这是因为我们的规划过于宏大，而又根本没有时间去实施。我们还犯有一个根本性的错误，即把我们的决心向大家宣布。这样一旦滑回到那些老习惯上去，我们在别人的眼里会显得更加难堪。我深知这些问题，于是，今年我对自己的计划要严加保密，只给自己定下两项适中的任务；每天早上锻炼身体，每天晚上多看点书。新年除夕举办的一次通宵晚会，使我理直气壮地在新年头一天免去了这两项任务。不过，新年第二天，我全力以赴地照着去做了。
    早锻炼一共只有11分钟，我打算在别人起床之前进行。这就要求我比平时早11分钟把自己从床上拽起来，这种自我约束是很艰苦的。不过开头两天我还是成功地蹑手蹑脚地来到楼下起居室，被谁也没发现。我在地毯上跳来蹦过去，扭曲身子，摆出各种姿势，弄得浑身不舒服，然后坐到桌边吃早饭，一副筋疲力尽的样子。正是这副模样泄露了我的秘密。第二天早晨全家人结队来到起居室看我表演。这真叫人不好意思，但我心平气和地顶住全家人的嘲笑和奚落。不久，大家对我习以为常了，而这时我的热情却减退了。我花在锻炼上的时间逐渐减少，慢慢地从11分钟减到了零。到了1月10日，我恢复了原来的作息时间。我辩解说，早晨少耗费精力锻炼，晚上下班回家看书时头脑更清醒些。有几天晚上，我极力摆脱了电视的诱惑，坐在自己的房间里，两眼盯在书上。可是，有一天夜里，我感到又冷又孤单，便来到楼下坐在电视机前假装看书。这下我可完了，因为不一会儿，我就恢复了以前的坏习惯，在屏幕前打起瞌睡来。但我还没有放弃多看些书的决心。事实上，我刚买来一本叫《一分钟读一千字的诀窍》的书。也许这本书能解决我的问题，但我一直还没时间去看这本书！
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2762  is_ascii: True     Predicting the future is notoriously difficult. Who could have imagined, in the mid 1970s, for example, that by the end of the 20th century, computers would be as common in people's homes as TV sets? In the 1970s, computers were common enough, but only in big business, government departments, and large organizations. These were the so-called mainframe machines. Mainframe computers were very large indeed, often occupying whole air-conditioned rooms, employing full-time technicians and run on specially-written software. Though these large machines still exist, many of their functions have been taken over by small powerful personal computers, commonly known as PCs.
    In 1975, a primitive machine called the Altair, was launched in the USA. It can properly be described as the first 'home computer' and it pointed the way to the future. This was followed, at the end of the 1970s, by a machine called an Apple. In the early 1980s, the computer giant, IBM produced the world's first Personal Computer. This ran on an 'operating system' called DOS, produced by a then small company named Microsoft. The IBM Personal Computer was widely copied. From those humble beginnings, we have seen the development of the user-friendly home computers and multimedia machines which are in common use today.
    Considering how recent these developments are, it is even more remarkable that as long ago as the 1960s, an Englishman, Leon Bagrit, was able to predict some of the uses of computers which we know today. Bagrit dismissed the idea that computers would learn to 'think' for themselves and would 'rule the world', which people liked to believe in those days. Bagrit foresaw a time when computers would be small enough to hold in the hand, when they would be capable of providing information about traffic jams and suggesting alternative routes, when they would be used in hospitals to help doctors to diagnose illnesses, when they would relieve office workers and accountants of dull, repetitive clerical work. All these computer uses have become commonplace. Of course, Leon Bagrit could not possibly have foreseen the development of the Internet, the worldwide system that enables us to communicate instantly with anyone in any part of the world by using computers linked to telephone networks. Nor could he have foreseen how we could use the Internet to obtain information on every known subject, so we can read it on a screen in our homes and even print it as well if we want to. Computers have become smaller and smaller, more and more powerful and cheaper and cheaper. This is what makes Leon Bagrit's predictions particularly remarkable. If he, or someone like him, were alive today, he might be able to tell us what to expect in the next fifty years.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 58  is_ascii: True      notoriously
adv. （尤指因坏事）众所周知地
len: 29  is_ascii: True      full-time
adj. 专职的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      technician
n.   技师
len: 25  is_ascii: True      software
n.   软件
len: 87  is_ascii: True      IBM
     （美国）国际商用机器公司（International Business Machines）
len: 59  is_ascii: True      DOS
     磁盘操作系统（Disk Operating System）
len: 44  is_ascii: True      Microsoft
n.   （美国）微软公司
len: 51  is_ascii: True      user-friendly
adj. 容易操作的，好用的
len: 44  is_ascii: True      mainframe
n.   主机，中央处理机
len: 33  is_ascii: True      multimedia
adj. 多媒体的
len: 31  is_ascii: True      alternative
adj. 选择的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      diagnose
v.   诊断
len: 24  is_ascii: True      relieve
v.   减轻
len: 27  is_ascii: True      accountant
n.   会计
len: 30  is_ascii: True      repetitive
adj. 重复的
len: 37  is_ascii: True      clerical
adj. 办公室工作的
len: 34  is_ascii: True      Internet
n.   国际交互网
len: 24  is_ascii: True      network
n.   网络
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2586  is_ascii: True     众所周知，预测未来是非常困难的。举个例子吧，在20世纪70年代中叶又有谁能想得到在20世纪末的时候，家庭用的计算机会像电视机一样普遍？在70年代，计算机已经相当普及了，但只用在大公司，政府部门和大的组织之中，它们被称为主机。计算机主机确实很大，常常占据了装有空调的多间房间，雇用专职的技师，而且得用专门编写的软件才能运行。虽然这种大计算机仍然存在，但它们的许多功能已被体积小但功能齐全的个人电脑——即我们常说的PC机——所代替了。
    1975年，美国推出了一台被称为“牛郎星”的原始机型。严格地说起来，它可以被称为第一台“家用电脑”，而且它也指了今后的方向。70年代末，在牛郎星之后又出现了一种被称为“苹果”的机型。80年代初，计算机行业的王牌公司美国国际商用机器公司（IBM）生产出了世界上第一台个人电脑。这种电脑采用了一种被称为磁盘操作系统（DOS）的工作程序，而这种程序是由当时规模不大的微软公司生产的。IBM的个人电脑被大规模地模仿。从那些简陋的初级阶段，我们看到了现在都已普及的、使用简便的家用电脑和多媒体的微机的发展。
    想一想这些发展的时间多么短，就更觉得英国人莱昂.巴格瑞特有着非凡的能力。他在60年代就能预言我们今天知道的计算机的一些用途。巴格瑞特根本不接受计算机可以学会自己去“思考”和计算可以“统治世界”这种想法，而这种想法是当时的人们都愿意相信的。巴格瑞特预示有一天计算机可以小到拿在手上，计算机可以使办公室人员和会计免除那些枯燥、重复的劳动。计算机的所有这些功能现在都变得很平常。当然了，莱昂.巴格瑞特根本没有可能预测到国际交互网——就是把计算机连结到电话线路上，以便和世界上任何一个地方的人立即进行联系的一个世界范围的通讯系统——的发展。他也无法预测到我们可以利用国际交互网获取有关任何已知专题的信息，以便在家里的屏幕上阅读，如果愿意的话甚至可以将其打印出来。计算机已经变得体积越来越小，功能越来越多，价格越来越低，这就是莱昂.巴格瑞特的预测非凡的地方。如果他或是像他的什么人今天还活着的话，他大概可以告诉我们下一个50年后会发生什么事情。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2927  is_ascii: True     My cousin, Harry, keeps a large curiously-shaped bottle on permanent display in his study. Despite the fact that the bottle is tinted a delicate shade of green, an observant visitor would soon notice that it is filled with what looks like a thick, grayish substance. If you were to ask Harry what was in the bottle, he would tell you that it contained perfumed mud. If you expressed doubt or surprise, he would immediately invite you to smell it and then to rub some into your skin. This brief experiment would dispel any further doubts you might have. The bottle really does contain perfumed mud. How Harry came into the possession of this outlandish stuff makes an interesting story which he is fond of relating. Furthermore, the acquisition of this bottle cured him of a bad habit he had been developing for years.
    Harry used to consider it a great joke to go into expensive cosmetic shops and make outrageous requests for goods that do not exist. He would invent fanciful names on the spot. On entering a shop, he would ask for a new perfume called 'Scented Shadow' or for 'insoluble bath cubes'. If a shop assistant told him she had not heard of it, he would pretend to be considerably put out. He loved to be told that one of his imaginary products was temporarily out of stock and he would faithfully promise to call again at some future date, but of course he never did. How Harry managed to keep a straight face during these performances is quite beyond me. 
    Harry does not need to be prompted to explain how he bought his precious bottle of mud. One day, he went to an exclusive shop in London and asked for 'Myrolite', the shop assistant looked puzzled and Harry repeated the word, slowly stressing each syllable. When the woman shook her head in bewilderment, Harry went on to explain that 'myrolite' was a hard, amber-like substance which could be used to remove freckles. This explanation evidently conveyed something to the woman who searched shelf after shelf. She produced all sorts of weird concoctions, but none of them met with Harry's requirements. When Harry put on his act of being mildly annoyed, the assistant promised to order some for him. Intoxicated by his success, Harry then asked for perfumed mud. He expected the assistant to look at him in blank astonishment. However, it was his turn to be surprised, for the woman's eyes immediately lit up and she fetched several bottles which she placed on the counter for Harry to inspect. For once, Harry had to admit defeat. He picked up what seemed to be the smallest bottle and discreetly asked the price. He was glad to get away with a mere twenty pounds and he beat a hasty retreat, clutching the precious bottle under his arm. From then on, Harry decided that this little game he had invented might prove to be expensive. The curious bottle, which now adorns the bookcase in his study, was his first and last purchase of rare cosmetics.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 29  is_ascii: True      permanent
adj. 永久的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      tint
v.   给……染色
len: 28  is_ascii: True      delicate
adj. 淡色的
len: 22  is_ascii: True      shade
n.   色度
len: 38  is_ascii: True      observant
adj. 观察力敏锐的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      dispel
v.   驱散，消除
len: 36  is_ascii: True      outlandish
adj. 稀奇古怪的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      acquisition
n.   获得
len: 28  is_ascii: True      cosmetic
n.   化妆品
len: 54  is_ascii: True      outrageous
adj. 无理的，令人不能容忍的
len: 34  is_ascii: True      fanciful
adj. 想像出来的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      insoluble
adj. 不可溶解的
len: 32  is_ascii: True      prompt
v.   敦促，激励
len: 41  is_ascii: True      exclusive
adj. 专售高档商品的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      syllable
n.   音节
len: 38  is_ascii: True      bewilderment
n.   迷惑，糊涂
len: 24  is_ascii: True      freckle
n.   雀斑
len: 41  is_ascii: True      evidently
adv. 显然的，明显地
len: 37  is_ascii: True      weird
adj. 奇异的，古怪的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      concoction
n.   调制品
len: 42  is_ascii: True      intoxicate
v.   陶醉，得意忘形
len: 40  is_ascii: True      blank
adj. 无表情的，茫然的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      discreetly
adv. 谨慎地
len: 23  is_ascii: True      clutch
v.   抓住
len: 31  is_ascii: True      adorn
v.   装饰，打扮
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2686  is_ascii: True     我的堂兄哈里在他的书房里一直摆着一只形状古怪的大瓶子。尽管那只瓶子呈淡绿色，但细心的客人很快就会发现瓶里装的是一种看上去黏稠，颜色发灰的东西。要是你问哈里瓶里装着什么，他会告诉你是香水泥。如果你表示怀疑或惊奇，他会立即请你闻一闻，然后取出一些抹在你的皮肤上。这一简单的试验会消除你可能存有的一切疑虑。瓶里装的的确是香水泥。哈里如何得到这种稀奇古怪的东西的，这里有个有趣的故事，而且他挺爱把它讲给别人听。此外，得到这瓶香水泥还治好了他多年的一个坏习惯。
    哈里曾认为走进一家名贵化妆品商店，荒唐地提出要买一种根本不存在的商品是件开心的事儿。他会当场编造出一些稀奇古怪的货名。他走进商店后，会提出要一种名叫“香影”的新型香水或什么“不溶浴皂”。要是女售货员告诉他从未听说过这些东西，他会装出十分遗憾和不安的样子。他爱听售货员说他想像出来的那种东西暂时脱销，于是他就煞有介事地许诺改天再来光顾。当然，他再也不会来了。我实在想像不出哈里在这些表演中是怎样装出一本正经的样子的。
    毋须暗示哈里就会向你讲起他买下那瓶珍贵香水泥的经过。一天，他去伦敦一家高级商店要买一种叫“密诺莱特”的东西，店员露出诧异的神色。哈里又慢慢地，一字一顿说了一遍这个词，那个女售货员还是迷惑不解地摇了摇头。哈里便进一步解释“密诺莱特”是一种质地坚硬、状似琥珀的东西，可以用来除去雀斑。他的解释显然对女售货员有些启示。她一个货架接着一个货架地寻找，拿出各种各样稀奇古怪的化妆品，但没有一样能够符合哈里的要求。哈里装出不高兴的样子时，女售货员答应为他定货。哈里为他的骗术而感到洋洋得意，又提出要买香水泥。他原想女售货员会惊奇地望着他，不知所措，没料到这回该轮到他自己吃惊了。因为那女售货员听完哈里的话后，马上眼睛一亮，拿出几瓶东西放在柜台上让哈里挑选。哈里只好认输。他挑出一个看上去最小的瓶子，谨慎地问了价。他庆幸自己只破费了20英镑便得以脱身。他把那宝贵的瓶子放在腋下夹着，溜之大吉。从那以后，他认识到自己发明的小小恶作剧是要付出很大的代价的。在他书房的书柜里摆着那瓶形状古怪的香水泥就是他第一次也是最后一次购买的稀有化妆品。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2849  is_ascii: True     The Scandinavian countries are much admired all over the world for their enlightened social policies. Sweden has evolved an excellent system for protecting the individual citizen from highhanded or incompetent public officers. The system has worked so well, that it has been adopted in other countries too.
    The Swedes were the first to recognize that public official like civil servants, police officers, health inspectors or tax-collectors can make mistakes or act over-zealously in the belief that they are serving the public. As long ago as 1809, the Swedish Parliament introduced a scheme to safeguard the interest of the individual. A parliamentary committee representing all political parties appoints a person who is suitably qualified to investigate private grievances against the State. The official title of the person is 'Justiteombudsman', but the Swedes commonly refer to him as the 'J.O.' or 'Ombudsman'. The Ombudsman is not subject to political pressure. He investigates complaints large and small that come to him from all levels of society. As complaints must be made in writing, the Ombudsman receives an average of 1,200 letters a year. He has eight lawyer assistants to help him and examines every single letter in detail. There is nothing secretive about the Ombudsman's work for his correspondence is open to public inspection. If a citizen's complaint is justified, the Ombudsman will act on his behalf. The action he takes varies according to the nature of the complaint. He may gently reprimand an official or even suggest to parliament that a law the altered. The following case is a typical example of the Ombudsman's work.
    A foreigner living in a Swedish village wrote to the Ombudsman complaining that he had been ill-treated by the police, simply because he was a foreigner. The Ombudsman immediately wrote to the Chief of Police in the district asking him to send a record of the case. There was nothing in the record to show that the foreigner's complaint was justified and the Chief of Police strongly denied the accusation. It was impossible for the Ombudsman to take action, but when he received a similar complaint from another foreigner in the same village, he immediately sent one of his layers to investigate the matter. The lawyer ascertained that a policeman had indeed dealt roughly with foreigners on several occasions. The fact that the policeman was prejudiced against foreigners could not be recorded in the official files. It was only possible for the Ombudsman to find this out by sending one of his representatives to check the facts. The policeman in question was severely reprimanded and was informed that if any further complaints were lodged against him, he would prosecuted. The Ombudsman's prompt action at once put an end to an unpleasant practice which might have gone unnoticed.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 29  is_ascii: True      evolve
v.   逐渐形成
len: 43  is_ascii: True      high-handed
adj. 高压的，专横的
len: 49  is_ascii: True      incompetent
adj. 不够格的，不称职的
len: 40  is_ascii: True      over-zealously
adv. 过分热情地
len: 26  is_ascii: True      safeguard
v.   保护
len: 33  is_ascii: True      parliamentary
adj. 国会的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      qalified
adj. 合格的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      grievance
n.   不平，冤屈
len: 57  is_ascii: True      Justiteombudsman
n.   （瑞典的）司法特派员
len: 58  is_ascii: True      ombudsman
n.  （瑞典和英国的）司法特派员
len: 29  is_ascii: True      secretive
adj. 保密的
len: 37  is_ascii: True      correspondence
n.   来往信件
len: 22  is_ascii: True      alter
v.   改变
len: 36  is_ascii: True      accusation
n.   谴责，指控
len: 35  is_ascii: True      ascertain
v.   查出，查明
len: 48  is_ascii: True      prejudiced
adj. 有偏见的，不公平的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      prompt
adj. 即时的
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2413  is_ascii: True     斯堪的纳维亚半岛各国实行开明的社会政策，受到全世界的推崇。在瑞典，已逐渐形成了一种完善的制度以保护每个公民不受专横的和不称职的政府官员的欺压。由于这种制度行之有效，已被其他国家采纳。
    是瑞典人首先认识到政府工作人员如文职人员、警官、卫生稽查员、税务人员等等也会犯错误或者自以为在为公众服务而把事情做过了头。早在1809年，瑞典论会就建立一个保护公民利益的制度。议会内有一个代表各政党利益的委员会，由它委派一位称职的人选专门调查个人对国家的意见。此人官衔为“司法特派员”，但瑞典人一般管他叫“J.O.”，即“司法特派员”。司法特派员不受任何政治压力的制约。他听取社会各阶层的各种大小意见，并进行调查。由于意见均需用书面形式提出，司法特派员每年平均收到1,200封信。他有8位律师作他的助手协助工作，每封信都详细批阅。司法特派员的工作没有什么秘密可言，他的信件是公开的，供公众监督。如果公民的意见正确，司法特派员便为他伸张正义。司法特员采取的行动因意见的性质不同而有所不同。他可以善意地批评某位官员，也可以甚至向议会提议修改某项法律。下述事件是司法特派员工作的一个典型例子。
    一个住在瑞典乡村的外国人写信给司法特派员，抱怨说他受到警察的虐待，原因就是因为他是个外国人。司法特派员立即写信给当地警察局长，请他寄送与此事有关的材料。材料中没有任何文字记载证明外国人所说的情况符合事实，警察局长矢口否认这一指控。司法特派员难以处理。但是，当他又收到住在同一村庄的另一个外国人写的一封内容类似的投诉信时，他立即派出一位律师前去调查。律师证实有个警察确实多次粗鲁地对待外国人。警察歧视外国人的事在官方档案中不可能加以记载，司法特派员只有派他的代表去核对事实才能了解真相。当事的警察受到严厉的斥责，并被告知，如果再有人投诉他，他将受到起诉。司法特派员及时采取的行动，迅速制止了这一起不愉快的事件，不然这件事可能因未得到人们注意而不了了之。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2904  is_ascii: True     We have been brought up to fear insects. We regard them as unnecessary creatures that do more harm than good. We continually wage war on them, for they contaminate our food, carry diseases, or devour our crops. They sting or bite without provocation; they fly uninvited into our rooms on summer nights, or beat ageist our lighted windows. We live in dread not only of unpleasant insects like spiders or wasps, but of quite harmless one like moths. Reading about them increases our understanding without dispelling our fears. Knowing that the industrious ant lives in a highly organized society does nothing to prevent us from being filled with revulsion when we find hordes of them crawling over a carefully prepared picnic lunch. No matter how much we like honey, or how much we have read about the uncanny sense of direction which bees possess, we have a horror of being stung. Most of our fears are unreasonable, but they are impossible to erase. At the same time, however, insects are strangely fascinating. We enjoy reading about them, especially when we find that, like the praying mantis, they lead perfectly horrible lives. We enjoy staring at them, entranced as they go about their business, unaware (we hope) of our presence. Who has not stood in awe at the sight of a spider pouncing on a fly, or a column of ants triumphantly bearing home an enormous dead beetle?
    Last summer I spent days in the garden watching thousands of ants crawling up the trunk of my prize peach tree. The tree has grown against a warm wall on a sheltered side of the house. I am especially proud of it, not only because it has survived several severe winters, but because it occasionally produces luscious peaches. During the summer, I noticed tat the leaves of the tree were beginning to wither. Clusters of tin insects called aphids were to be found on the underside of the leaves. They were visited by a large colony of ants which obtained a sort of honey from them. I immediately embarked on an experiment which, even though if failed to get rid of the ants, kept me fascinated for twenty-four hours. I bound the base of the tree with sticky tape, making it impossible for the ants to reach the aphids. The tape was so stick that they did not dare to cross it. For a long time. I watched them scurrying around the base of the tree in bewilderment. I even went out at midnight with a torch and noted with satisfaction (and surprise) that the ants were still swarming around the sticky tape without being able to do anything about it. I got up early next morning hoping to find that the ants had given up in despair. Instead, I saw that they had discovered a new route. They were climbing up the wall of the house and then on to the leaves of the tree. I realized sadly that I had been completely defeated by their ingenuity. The ants had been quick to find an answer to my thoroughly unscientific methods! 
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 23  is_ascii: True      insect
n.   昆虫
len: 33  is_ascii: True      wage
v.   进行（斗争）
len: 28  is_ascii: True      contaminate
v.   弄脏
len: 28  is_ascii: True      provocation
n.   惹怒
len: 23  is_ascii: True      spider
n.   蜘蛛
len: 21  is_ascii: True      wasp
n.   黄蜂
len: 21  is_ascii: True      moth
n.   飞蛾
len: 21  is_ascii: True      ant
n.   蚂蚁 
len: 27  is_ascii: True      revulsion 
n.   厌恶
len: 19  is_ascii: True      horde
n.   群
len: 46  is_ascii: True      uncanny 
adj. 神秘的，不可思议的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      erase
v.   擦，抹去
len: 31  is_ascii: True      praying mantis
     螳螂
len: 29  is_ascii: True      entranced
adj. 出神的
len: 23  is_ascii: True      beetle
n.   甲虫
len: 47  is_ascii: True      sheltered
adj. 伤不着的，无危险的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      luscious
adj. 甘美的
len: 22  is_ascii: True      cluster
n. 一簇
len: 22  is_ascii: True      aphid
n.   蚜虫
len: 35  is_ascii: True      underside
n.   底面，下侧
len: 23  is_ascii: True      colony
n.   一群
len: 23  is_ascii: True      sticky
adj. 粘的
len: 26  is_ascii: True      scurry
v.   小步跑
len: 22  is_ascii: True      swarm
v.   聚集
len: 26  is_ascii: True      ingenuity
n.   机灵
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2696  is_ascii: True     我们自幼就在对昆虫的惧怕中长大。我们把昆虫当作害多益少的无用东西。人类不断同昆虫斗争，因为昆虫弄脏我们的食物，传播疾病，吞噬庄稼。它们无缘无故地又叮又咬；夏天的晚上，它们未经邀请便飞到我们房间里，或者对着露出亮光的窗户乱扑乱撞。我们在日常生活中，不但憎恶如蜘蛛、黄蜂之类令人讨厌的昆虫，而且憎恶并无大害的飞蛾等。阅读有关昆虫的书能增加我们对它们的了解，却不能消除我们的恐惧的心理。即使知道勤奋的蚂蚁生活具有高度组织性的社会里，当看到大群蚂蚁在我们精心准备的午间野餐上爬行时，我们也无法抑制对它们的反感。不管我们多么爱吃蜂蜜，或读过多少关于蜜蜂具有神秘的识别方向的灵感的书，我们仍然十分害怕被蜂蜇。我们的恐惧大部分是没有道理的，但去无法消除。同时，不知为什么昆虫又是迷人的。我们喜欢看有关昆虫的书，尤其是当我们了解螳螂等过着一种令人生畏的生活时，就更加爱读有关昆虫的书了。我们喜欢入迷地看它们做事，它们不知道（但愿如此）我们就在它们身边。当看到蜘蛛扑向一只苍蝇时，一队蚂蚁抬着一只巨大的死甲虫凯旋归时，谁能不感到敬畏呢？
    去年夏天，我花了好几天时间站在花园里观察成千只蚂蚁爬上我那棵心爱的桃树的树干。那棵树是靠着房子有遮挡的一面暖墙生长的。我为这棵树感到特别自豪，不仅因为它度过了几个寒冬终于活了下来，而且还因为它有时结出些甘甜的桃子来。到了夏天，我发现树叶开始枯萎，结果在树叶背面找到成串的叫作蚜虫小虫子。蚜虫遭到一窝蚂蚁的攻击，蚂蚁从它们身上可以获得一种蜜。我当即动手作了一项试验，这项试验尽管没有使我摆脱这些蚂蚁，却使我着迷了24小时。我用一条胶带把桃树底部包上，不让蚂蚁接近蚜虫。胶带极粘，蚂蚁不敢从上面爬过。在很长一段时间里，我看见蚂蚁围着大树底部来回转悠，不知所措。半夜，我还拿着电筒来到花园里，满意地（同时惊奇地）发现那些蚂蚁还围着胶带团团转。无能为力。第二天早上，我起床后希望看见蚂蚁已因无望而放弃了尝试，结果却发现它们又找到一条新的路径。它们正在顺着房子的外墙往上爬，然后爬上树叶。我懊丧地感到败在了足智多谋的蚂蚁的手下。蚂蚁已很快找到了相应的对策，来对付我那套完全不科学的办法！
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2868  is_ascii: True     Recent developments in astronomy have made it possible to detect planets in our won Milky Way and in other galaxies. This is a major achievement because, in relative terms, planets are very small and old not emit light. Finding planets is proving hard enough, but finding life on them will prove infinitely more difficult. The first question to answer is whether a planet can actually support life. In our won solar system, for example, Venus is far too hot and Mars is far too cold to support life. Only the Earth provides ideal conditions, and even here it has taken more than four billion years for plant and animal life to evolve.
    Whether a planet can support life depends on the size and brightness of its star, that is its 'sun'. Imagine a star up t twenty times larger, brighter, brighter and hotter than our own sun. A planet would have to be a very long way from it to be capable of supporting life. Alternatively, if the star were small, the life-supporting planet would have to have a close orbit round it and also provide the perfect conditions for life forms to develop. But how would we find such a planet? At present, there is no telescope in existence that is capable of detecting the presence of life. The development of such a telescope will be one of the great astronomical projects of the twenty-first century.
    It is impossible to look for life on another planet using earth-based telescopes. Our own warm atmosphere and the heat generated by the telescope would make it impossible to detect objects as small as planets. Even a telescope in orbit round the earth, like the very successful Hubble telescope, would not be suitable because of the dust particles iron solar system. A telescope would have to be as far away as the planet Jupiter to look for life in outer space, because the dust becomes thinner the further we travel towards the outer edges of our own solar system. Once we detected a planet, we would have to find a way of blotting out the light from its star, so that we would be able to 'see' the planet properly and analyze its atmosphere. In the first instance, we would be looking for plant life, rather than 'little green men'. The life forms most likely to develop on a planet would be bacteria. It is bacteria that have generated the oxygen we breathe on earth. For most of the earth's history they have been the only form of life on our planet. As Earth-dwellers, we always cherish the hope that we will be visited by little green men and that we will be able to communicate with them. But this hope is always in the realms of science fiction. If we were able to discover lowly forms of life like bacteria on another planet, it would completely change our view of ourselves. As Daniel Goldin of NASA observed, 'Finding life elsewhere would change everything. No human endeavor or thought would be unchanged by it."
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 29  is_ascii: True      astronomy
n.   天文学
len: 28  is_ascii: True      relative
adj. 相对的
len: 42  is_ascii: True      infinitely
adv. 无限地，无穷地
len: 28  is_ascii: True      solar
adj. 太阳系的
len: 22  is_ascii: True      Venus
n.   金星
len: 21  is_ascii: True      Mars
n.   火星
len: 28  is_ascii: True      orbit
n.   运行轨道
len: 35  is_ascii: True      astronomical
adj. 天文学的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      generate
v.   产生
len: 34  is_ascii: True      particle
n.   微粒，粒子
len: 24  is_ascii: True      Jupiter
n.   木星
len: 21  is_ascii: True      blot
v.   遮暗
len: 24  is_ascii: True      analyse
v.   分析
len: 25  is_ascii: True      bacteria
n.   细菌
len: 23  is_ascii: True      oxygen
n.   氧气
len: 22  is_ascii: True      realm
n.   领域
len: 26  is_ascii: True      endeavour
v.   努力
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2695  is_ascii: True     The river which forms the eastern boundary of our farm has always played an important part in our lives. Without it we could not make a living. There is only enough spring water to supply the needs of the houses, so we have to pump from the river for farm use. We tell river all our secrets. We know instinctively, just as beekeepers with their bees, that misfortune might overtake us if the important events of our lives were not related to it.
    We have special river birthday parties in the summer. Sometimes were go upstream to a favourite backwater, sometimes we have our party at the boathouse, which a predecessor of ours at the farm built in the meadow hard by the deepest pool for swimming and diving. In a heat wave we choose a midnight birthday party and that is the most exciting of all. We welcome the seasons by the riverside, crowning the youngest girl with flowers in the spring, holding a summer festival on Midsummer Eve, giving thanks for the harvest in the autumn, and throwing a holy wreath into the current in the winter.
    After a long period of rain the river may overflow its banks. This is a rare occurrence as our climate seldom guest to extremes. We are lucky in that only the lower fields, which make up a very small proportion of our farm, are effected by flooding, but other farms are less favorably sited, and flooding can sometimes spell disaster for their owners.
    One had winter we watched the river creep up the lower meadows. All the cattle had been moved into stalls and we stood to lose little. We were, however, worried about our nearest neighbors, whose farm was low lying and who were newcomers to the district. As the floods had put the telephone out of order, we could not find out how they were managing. From an attic window we could get a sweeping view of the river where their land joined ours, and at the most critical juncture we took turns in watching that point. The first sign of disaster was a dead sheep floating down. Next came a horse, swimming bravely, but we were afraid that the strength of the current would prevent its landing anywhere before it became exhausted. Suddenly a raft appeared, looking rather like Noah's ark, carrying the whole family, a few hens, the dogs, cat, and bird in a cage. We realized that they must have become unduly frightened by the rising flood, for their house, which had sound foundations, would have stood stoutly even if it had been almost submerged. The men of our family waded down through our flooded meadows with boathooks, in the hope of being able to grapple a corner of the raft and pull it out of the current towards our bank. We still think it a miracle that they we able to do so.
len: 78  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
 
     boundary
n.   界线；边界
len: 24  is_ascii: True      pump
v.   用泵抽
len: 31  is_ascii: True      overtake
v.   突然降临
len: 32  is_ascii: True      backwater
n.   回水河汊
len: 37  is_ascii: True      predecessor
n.   前任，前辈
len: 32  is_ascii: True      meadow
n.   草地，草场
len: 34  is_ascii: True      crown
v.   给……戴花环
len: 34  is_ascii: True      holly
n.   一种冬青植物
len: 23  is_ascii: True      wreath
n.   花环
len: 33  is_ascii: True      occurrence
n.   偶发事件
len: 27  is_ascii: True      proportion
n.   部分
len: 24  is_ascii: True      site
v.   使位于
len: 31  is_ascii: True      spell
v.   招致，带来
len: 25  is_ascii: True      stall
n.   牲口棚
len: 22  is_ascii: True      attic
n.   顶楼
len: 35  is_ascii: True      sweeping 
adj. 范围广大的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      critical
adj. 危急的
len: 34  is_ascii: True      juncture
n.   时刻，关头
len: 21  is_ascii: True      raft
n.   木筏
len: 26  is_ascii: True      unduly
adv. 过度地
len: 28  is_ascii: True      foundations
n.   地基
len: 39  is_ascii: True      stoutly
adv. 牢固地，粗壮的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      submerge
v.   浸没
len: 24  is_ascii: True      grapple
v.   抓住
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2740  is_ascii: True     I stopped to let the car cool off and to study the map. I had expected to be near my objective by now, but everything still seemed alien to me. I was only five when my father had taken me abroad, and that we eighteen years ago. When my mother had died after a tragic accident, he did not quickly recover from the shock and loneliness. Everything around him was full of her presence, continually reopening the wound. So he decided to emigrate. In the new country he became absorbed in making a new life for the two of us, so that he gradually ceased to grieve. He did not marry again and I was brought up without a woman's care; but I lacked for nothing, for he was both father and mother to me. He always meant to go back on day, but not to stay. His roots and mine bad become too firmly embedded in the new land. But he wanted to see the old folk again and to visit my mother's grave. He became mortally ill a few months before we had planned to go and, when he knew that he was dying, he made me promise to go on my own.
    I hired a car the day after landing and bought a comprehensive book of maps, which I found most helpful on the cross-country journey, but which I did not think I should need on the last stage. It was not that I actually remembered anything at all. But my father had described over and over again what we should see at every milestone, after leaving the nearest town, so that I was positive I should recognize it as familiar territory. Well, I had been wrong, for I was now lost.
    I looked at the map and then at the millimeter. I had come ten miles since leaving the town, and at this point, according to my father, I should be looking at farms and cottages in a valley, with the spire of the church of our village showing in the far distance. I could see no valley, no farms, no cottages and no church spire -- only a lake. I decided that I must have taken a wrong turning somewhere. So I drove back to the town and began to retrace the route, taking frequent glances at the map. I landed up at the same corner. The curious thing was that the lake was not marked on the map. I left as if I had stumbled into a nightmare country, as you sometimes do in dreams. And, as in a nightmare, there was nobody in sight to help me. Fortunately for me, as I was wondering what to do next, there appeared on the horizon a man on horseback, riding in my direction. I waited till he came near, then I asked him the way to our old village. He said that there was now no village. I thought he must have misunderstood me, so I repeated its name. This time he pointed to the lake. The village no longer existed because it had been submerged, and all the valley too. The lake was not a natural one, but a man-made reservoir.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 37  is_ascii: True      alien
adj. 异国的，外国的
len: 37  is_ascii: True      emigrate
v.   移居（国外）
len: 32  is_ascii: True      absorb
v.   全神贯注于
len: 29  is_ascii: True      embedded 
adj. 扎牢的
len: 28  is_ascii: True      mortally
adv. 致命地
len: 45  is_ascii: True      comprehensive
adj. 广泛的；丰富的
len: 29  is_ascii: True      milestone
n.   里程碑
len: 35  is_ascii: True      territory
n.   领地；地区
len: 29  is_ascii: True      milometer
n.   计程表
len: 36  is_ascii: True      spire
n.  （教堂的）塔尖
len: 33  is_ascii: True      retrace
v.   返回，重走
len: 30  is_ascii: True      stumble
v.   趔趄地走
len: 27  is_ascii: True      horizon
n.   地平线
len: 26  is_ascii: True      reservoir
n.   水库
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2522  is_ascii: True     我停下车，让汽车发动机冷却一下，同时查看一下地图。我本想离目的地已经不远，但周围一切对我仍很陌生。我5岁那年，父亲就带我出了国，那是18年前的事了。当时我母亲在一次事故中惨死，父亲未能很快从悲痛与孤独中恢复过来。他身边的一切都是母亲的影子不断勾起他的伤感。于是他决定移居他国。在这个新的国家里，父亲专心致志地为我们俩开创一种新的生活，慢慢地不伤心了。父亲没有再娶，因此，我在没有母亲的环境里长大成人。但我却什么都不缺，他既当父亲又当母亲。他总想将来回国看看，但却不愿长期住下去，因为他与我一样已经把根深深地扎在异国的土地上。 但是，他想看一看家乡父老乡亲，为我的母亲扫墓。就在他计划回国的前几个月，他突然身患绝症。他知道自己已奄奄一息，于是他要我答应一定单独回故乡一趟。
    我下飞机后租了一辆车，并买了一本详尽的地图册。在乡间行车途中，我觉得它非常有用，但快到家了，我倒觉得它没什么用了。这倒并非是我背熟了地图，而是父亲曾详细给我讲了，在过了离故乡最近的那个小镇后，在每一个路标处可见到些什么。因此，我相信这段路对我来说会是很熟悉的。唉，实际我错了，我现在迷路了。
    我看了看地图，又查了一下里程表。从小镇出来，我走了10英里。照父亲的说法，我面前应是一个山谷，有农场与村舍，还可远远望见老家村子里的教堂的尖顶。可现在我却看不出山谷，看不见农舍，也看见教学尖顶，看见只是一片湖泊。我想一定是什么地方拐错了弯儿。于是我驾车返回小镇，重新按路线行驶。结果又来到刚才那个拐弯处。奇怪的是那个湖没有在地图上标出。我感到自己就像平时作梦那样迷迷糊糊地闯进了恶梦境地。就像在恶梦里一样，见不到一个人可以帮助我。不过，我是幸运的，正当我走投无路之时，从天边出现一个骑马的人向我骑来。等他走近了，问他去老家的路。他说那村子已经没有了。我想他一定误解了我的意思，于是又说一遍村庄的名字。这次他用手指了一下那个湖。村庄已不复存在，因为已经为水所淹，山谷也被水淹没了。这不是一个天然湖泊，是一座人工修建的水库。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2780  is_ascii: True     The old lady was glad to be back at the block of flats where she lived. Her shopping had tired her and her basket ad grown heavier with every step of the way home. In the life her thoughts were on lunch and a good rest; but when she got out at her own floor, both were forgotten in her sudden discovery that her front door was open. She was thinking that she must reprimand her home help the next morning for such a monstrous piece of negligence, when she remembered that she had gone shopping after the home help had left and she knew that she had turned both keys in their locks, She walked slowly into the hall and at once noticed that all the room doors were open, yet following her regular practice she had shut them before going out. Looking into the drawing room, she saw a scene of confusion over by her writing desk. It was as clear as daylight then that burglars had forced an entry during her absence. Her first impulse was to go round all the rooms looking for the thieves, but then she decided that at her age it might be more prudent to have someone with her, so she went to fetch the porter from his basement. By this time her legs were beginning to tremble, so she sat down and accepted a cup of very strong tea, while he telephoned the police. Then, her composure regained, she was ready to set off with the porter's assistance to search for nay intruders who might still be lurking in her flat.
    They went through the rooms, being careful to touch nothing, as they did not want to hinder the police in their search for fingerprints. The chaos was inconceivable. She had lived in the flat for thirty years and was a veritable magpie at hoarding; and it seemed as though everything she possessed had been tossed out and turned over and over. At least sorting out the things she should have discarded years ago was now being made easier for her. Then a police inspector arrived with a constable and she told them of her discovery of the ransacked flat. The inspector began to look for fingerprints, while the constable checked that the front door locks had not been forced, thereby proving that the burglars had either used skeleton keys or entered over the balcony. There was no trace of fingerprints, but the inspector found a dirty red bundle that contained jewellery which the old lady said was not hers. So their entry into this flat was apparently not the burglars' first job that day and they must have been disturbed. The inspector then asked the old lady to try to check what was missing by the next day and advised her not to stay alone in the flat for a few nights. The old lady though the was a fussy creature, but since the porter agreed with him, she rang up her daughter and asked for her help in what she described as a little spot of bother.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 21  is_ascii: True      life
n.   电梯
len: 41  is_ascii: True      monstrous
adj. 极大的，可怕的
len: 33  is_ascii: True      negligence
n.   粗心大意
len: 21  is_ascii: True      lurk
v.   潜藏
len: 23  is_ascii: True      hinder
v.   妨碍
len: 28  is_ascii: True      fingerprint
n.   指纹
len: 35  is_ascii: True      chaos
n.   混乱，无秩序 
len: 39  is_ascii: True      inconceivable
adj. 不可思议的
len: 47  is_ascii: True      veritable
adj. 真正的，地地道道的
len: 41  is_ascii: True      magpie
n.   喜欢收藏物品的人
len: 27  is_ascii: True      prudent
adj. 谨慎的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      composure
n.   镇静，沉着
len: 52  is_ascii: True      intruder
n.   入侵者（尤指欲行窃者）
len: 18  is_ascii: True      toss
v.   扔
len: 21  is_ascii: True      discard
v.   丢
len: 24  is_ascii: True      discard
v.   丢弃
len: 26  is_ascii: True      constable
n.   警察
len: 24  is_ascii: True      ransack
v.   洗劫
len: 24  is_ascii: True      balcony
n.   阳台
len: 56  is_ascii: True      fussy
adj. 大惊小怪的，小题大作的       
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2435  is_ascii: True     老妇人回到了她居住的公寓楼，心里很高兴。去商店买东西把她搞得筋疲力尽；在回家的路上，她每走一步，就感到手里的篮子又重了一点。她乘上电梯后，只想着午餐和好好休息一下。但她到自己的楼层走出电梯后，就把这两件事忘了个干净，因为她突然发现她家的大门开着。她心想明天上午一定要好好训斥那个干家务的帮手，她竟如此疏忽大意。但突然记起来了，帮手是在她出去买东西之前走的，她还记得曾用了两把钥匙把大门锁上了。她慢慢地走进前厅，立即发现所有的房门都敞开着，而她记得在出门买东西前，她按老规矩是把房门一一锁上的。她往起居室里看去，写字台边一片狼籍。事情很清楚，在她外出时，窃贼曾闯进家门。她第一个条件反射是各个房间搜寻一下窃贼，但转念一想，像她这个年纪，最好找个人一起去。于是她到地下室去找看门的人。这时她两腿累得开始发抖，于是坐了下来，喝了一杯浓茶。与此同时，看门的人给警察挂了电话。此刻老妇人也镇定了下来，准备在看门人的协助下搜寻可能仍躲藏在她房里的窍贼。
    他俩搜遍这每一个房间，小心翼翼地不接触任何东西，因为他们怕妨碍警察寻找指纹。房间里的紊乱状况是无法想像的。老妇人在这套公寓里住了30年，她又是个名副其实的收藏家。看来她的每一件东西都被翻了出来，并且被里里外外看了遍。这样一来，她倒是容易将那些几年前就该扔掉的东西找出来了。过了一会儿，一位巡官带着一名警察来了。她向他们讲述了发现公寓遭劫的经过。巡官开始搜寻指纹，警察经检查发现大门锁头并无撬过的迹象。由此可以证明，窍贼或者是用万能钥匙，或者是翻越阳台进来的。巡官没有发现指纹，却发现了一个装有珠宝的、肮脏的红包袱。老妇人说那不是她的。很明显，闯进这套公寓的窃贼那天并不是首次作案，而且他一定受了惊吓。巡官请老妇人在次日之前设法查清丢了些什么，并劝她几夜之内不要独自一人在公寓过夜。老妇人觉得巡官大惊小怪，但既然看门人也同意他的意见，她只得打电话向女儿求援，说她碰到了一点儿小麻烦。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 2947  is_ascii: True     People tend to amass possessions, sometimes without being aware of doing so. Indeed they can have a delightful surprise when they find something useful which they did not know they owned. Those who never have to move house become indiscriminate collectors of what can only be described as clutter. They leave unwanted objects in drawers, cupboards and attics for years, in the belief that they may one day need just those very things. As they grow old, people also accumulate belongings for two other reasons, lack of physical and mental energy, both of which are essential in turning out and throwing away, and sentiment. Things owned for a long time are full associations with the past, perhaps with relatives who are dead, and so they gradually acquire a value beyond their true worth.
    Some things are collected deliberately in the home in an attempt to avoid waste. Among these I would list string and brown paper, kept by thrifty people when a parcel has been opened, to save buying these two requisites. Collecting small items can easily become a mania. I know someone who always cuts sketches out from newspapers of model clothes that she would like to buy if she had the money. As she is not rich, the chances that she will ever be able to afford such purchases are remote; but she is never sufficiently strong-minded to be able to stop the practice. It is a harmless bait, but it litters up her desk to such an extent that every time she opens it, loose bits of paper fall out in every direction.
    Collecting as a serous hobby is quite different and has many advantages. It provides relaxation for leisure hours, as just looking at one's treasures is always a joy. One does not have to go outside for amusement, since the collection is housed at home. Whatever it consists of, stamps, records, first editions of books china, glass, antique furniture, pictures, model cars, stuffed birds, toy animals, there is always something to do in connection with it, from finding the right place for the latest addition, to verifying facts in reference books. This hobby educates one not only in the chosen subject, but also in general matters which have some bearing on it. There are also other benefits. One wants to meet like-minded collectors, to get advice, to compare notes, to exchange articles, to show off the latest find. So one's circle of friends grows. Soon the hobby leads to travel, perhaps to a meeting in another town, possibly a trip abroad in search of a rare specimen, for collectors are not confined to any one country. Over the years, one may well become a authority on one's hobby and will very probably be asked to give informal talks to little gatherings and then, if successful, to larger audiences. In this way self-confidence grows, first from mastering a subject, then from being able to take about it. Collecting, by occupying spare time so constructively, makes a person contented, with no time for boredom.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 22  is_ascii: True      amass
v.   积聚
len: 40  is_ascii: True      indiscriminate
adj. 不加选择的
len: 30  is_ascii: True      clutter
n.   一堆杂物
len: 23  is_ascii: True      string
n.   细线
len: 29  is_ascii: True      requisite
n.   必需品
len: 22  is_ascii: True      mania
n.   癖好
len: 32  is_ascii: True      sketch
n.   草图，图样
len: 56  is_ascii: True      remote
adj. （机会，可能性）少的，小的
len: 39  is_ascii: True      strong-minded
adj. 意志坚强的
len: 36  is_ascii: True      relaxation
n.   休息，娱乐
len: 32  is_ascii: True      verify
v.   查证，核实
len: 35  is_ascii: True       bearing
n.    关系，联系
len: 37  is_ascii: True      like-minded
adj. 志趣相投的
len: 25  is_ascii: True      specimen
n.   标本
len: 46  is_ascii: True      constructively
adv. 有益的，积极的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      contented
adj. 心满意足的
len: 35  is_ascii: True       boredom
n.    烦恼，无聊
len: 12  is_ascii: True 参考译文
len: 2915  is_ascii: True     人们喜欢收藏东西，有时并没有意识到自己在这样做。确实，一旦无意之中从自己的收藏品中找到某件有用的东西时，可以给人一种惊喜的感觉。那些从来不必搬家的人们成了一种无所无容的收藏家。他们专门收藏那些只能被称作杂货的东西。他们在抽屉里，碗柜中、阁楼上堆放着一些不用的东西，一放就是好几年，相信总有一天需要的正好是那些东西。人们年老之后也喜欢收藏东西，不过是出于两个不同的原因：一是体力，精力均告不佳，这二者是清除无用的东西必不可少的因素；另一原因是感情因素。东西搁得时间久了，便会充满着与过去岁月的联系，比方说与死去的亲戚有关。因此这些东西慢慢获得了一种超出它本身的价值。
    居家度日，有目的地收藏某些东西是为了防止浪费。这些东西中我想举出线绳和包装纸为例。节俭的人们打开包裹后便把这两样必备的东西收藏起来。省得日后去买。收集小玩艺儿很容易着迷。我认识一个人，她总喜欢从报纸上剪下流行服装的图样，等以后有钱时去买服装。由于她并不富裕，她买得起这些服装的可能性十分渺茫。但她又缺乏足够坚强的意志把这一收集活动停下来。这种习惯无害，只把写字台里堆得满满当当，以致每次打开抽屉总能带出许多纸片四处飞扬。
    作为一种严肃的业余爱好的收藏活动完全是另外一回事，它具有许多益处。它可以使人在闲暇中得到休息，因为欣赏自己收藏的珍品总会充满了乐趣。人们不必走到户外去寻求娱乐，因为收藏品都是存放在家中。不管收藏品是什么，邮票、唱片、头版书籍、瓷器、玻璃杯、老式家具、绘画、模型汽车、鸟类标本，还是玩具动物，从为新增添的收藏品寻找摆放位置到核对参考书中的事实，总归有事可做。这种爱好不仅能使人从选择的专题中受到教育，而且也能从与之有关的一般事物中获得长进。除此之外，还有其他的益处。收藏者要会见情趣相投的收藏者，以获取教益，交流经验、交换收藏品，炫耀自己的最新收藏。朋友的圈子就这样不断扩大。用不了多久，有这种爱好的人便开始旅行，也许是去另一个城市参加会议，也可能是出国寻找一件珍品，因为收藏家是不分国籍的。一人积了多年经验会成为自己这种爱好的权威，很可能应邀在小型集会上作非正式的讲话。如果讲得好，可能向更多人发表演说。这样，你自信心不断增强，先是因为掌握一门学问，接下来是因为能够就此发表见解。收藏活动通过富有建设性地利用业余时间使人感到心满意足，不再有无聊之日。
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
len: 3164  is_ascii: True     Punctuality is a necessary habit in all public affairs in civilized society. Without it, nothing could ever be brought to a conclusion; everything would be in state of chaos. Only in a sparsely-populated rural community is it possible to disregard it. In ordinary living, there can be some tolerance of unpunctuality. The intellectual, who is working on some abstruse problem, has everything coordinated and organized for the matter in hand. He is therefore forgiven if late for a dinner party. But people are often reproached for unpunctuality when their only fault is cutting things fine. It is hard for energetic, quick-minded people to waste time, so they are often tempted to finish a job before setting out to keep an appointment. If no accidents occur on the way, like punctured tires, diversions of traffic, sudden descent of fog, they will be on time. They are often more industrious, useful citizens than those who are never late. The over-punctual can be as much a trial to others as the unpunctual. The guest who arrives half an hour too soon is the greatest nuisance. Some friends of my family had this irritating habit. The only thing to do was ask them to come half an hour later than the other guests. Then they arrived just when we wanted them.
    If you are citing a train, it is always better to be comfortably early than even a fraction of a minted too late. Although being early may mean wasting a little time, this will be less than if you miss the train and have to wait an hour or more for the next one; and you avoid the frustration of arriving at the very moment when the train is drawing out of the station and being unable to get on it. An even harder situation is to be on the platform in good time for a train and still to see it go off without you. Such an experience befell a certain young girl the first time she was traveling alone.
    She entered the station twenty minutes before the train was due, since her parents had impressed upon her that it would be unforgivable to miss it and cause the friends with whom she was going to stay to make two journeys to meet her. She gave her luggage to a porter and showed him her ticket. To her horror he said that she was two hours too soon. She felt inhere handbag for the piece of paper on which her father had written down al the details of the journey and gave it to the porter. He agreed that a train did come into the station at the time on the paper and that it did stop, but only to take on mail, not passengers. The girl asked to see a timetable, feeling sure that her father could not have made such a mistake. The porter went to fetch one and arrive back with the station master, who produced it with a flourish and pointed out a microscopic 'o' beside the time of the arrival of the train at his station; this little 'o' indicated that the train only stopped for mail. Just as that moment the train came into the station. The girl, tears streaming down her face, begged to be allowed to slip into the guard's van. But the station master was adamant: rules could not be broken and she had to watch that train disappear towards her destination while she was left behind.
len: 41  is_ascii: True New words and expressions 生词和短语
len: 28  is_ascii: True      punctuality
n.   准时
len: 25  is_ascii: True      rural
adv. 农村的
len: 35  is_ascii: True      disregard
v.   不顾，无视
len: 35  is_ascii: True      intellectual
n.   知识分子
len: 28  is_ascii: True      abstruse
adj. 深奥的
len: 27  is_ascii: True      coordinate
v.   协调
len: 25  is_ascii: True      reproach
v.   责备
len: 37  is_ascii: True      puncture
v.   刺破（轮胎）
len: 35  is_ascii: True      diversion
n.   改道，绕道
len: 34  is_ascii: True      trial
n.   讨厌的事，人
len: 35  is_ascii: True      fraction 
n.   很小一点儿
len: 42  is_ascii: True       flourish
n.    挥舞（打手劳）
len: 31  is_ascii: True      microscopic
adj. 微小的
len: 61  is_ascii: True      adamant
adj. 坚定的，不动摇的
     
参考译文
len: 2641  is_ascii: True     准时是文明社会中进行一切社交活动时必须养成的习惯。不准时将一事无成，事事都会陷入混乱不堪的境地。只有在人口稀少的农村，才可以忽视准时的习惯。在日常生活中人们可以容忍一定程度的不准时。一个专心钻研某个复杂问题的知识分子，为了搞好手头的研究，要把一切都协调一致，组织周密。因此，他要是赴宴迟到了会得到谅解。但有些人不准时常常因为掐钟点所致，他们常常受到责备，精力充沛、头脑敏捷的人极不愿意浪费时间，因此他们常想做完一件事后再去赴约。要是路上没有发生如爆胎、改道、突然起雾等意外事故，他们决不会迟到。他们与那些从不迟到的人相比，常常是更勤奋有用的公民。早到的人同迟到的人一样令人讨厌。客人提前半小时到达是令人讨厌的。我家有几个朋友就有这有令人恼火的习惯。唯一的办法就是请他们比别的客人晚来半小时。这样，他们可以恰好在我们要求的时间到达。
    如果赶火车，早到总比晚到好，哪怕早到一会儿也好。虽然早到可能意味着浪费一点时间，但这比误了火车等上一个多小时坐下班车浪费的时间要少，而且可以避免那种正好在火车驶出站时赶到车站，因上不去车而感到的沮丧。更难堪的情况是虽然及时赶到站台上，却眼睁睁地看着那趟火车启动，把你抛下。一个小姑娘第一次单独出门就碰到了这种情况。
    在火车进站20分钟前她就进了车站。因为她的父母再三跟她说，如果误了这趟车，她的东道主朋友就得接她两趟，这是不应该的。她把行李交给搬运工并给他看了车票。搬运工说她早到了两个小时，她听后大吃一惊。她从钱包里摸出一张纸条，那上面有她父亲对这次旅行详细说明，她把这张纸条交给了搬运工。搬运工说，正如纸条所说，确有一趟火车在那个时刻到站，但它只停站装邮件，不载旅客。姑娘要求看到时刻表，因为她相信父亲不能把这么大的事弄错。搬运工跑回去取时刻表，同时请来了站长。站长拿着时刻表一挥手，指着那趟列车到站时刻旁边一个很小的圆圈标记。这个标记表示列车是为装邮件而停车。正在这时，火车进站了。女孩泪流满面，央求让她不声不响地到押车员车厢里去算了。但站长态度坚决，规章制度不能破坏，姑娘只得眼看那趟火车消逝在她要去的方向而撇下了她。
len: 202  is_ascii: True 本书由TXT小说电子书下载网站http://www.bookdown.com.cn提供.
声明：本书仅供读者预览,请在下载24小时内删除，不得用作商业用途；如果喜欢请购买正版图书！
len: 315  is_ascii: True ---------------------------用户上传之内容结束--------------------------------
声明：本书为TXT图书下载网(bookdown.com.cn)的用户上传至其在本站的存储空间，本站只提供TXT全集电子书存储服务以及免费下载服务，以上作品内容之版权与本站无任何关系。

